Mark

Chapter 1

1 The beginning of the gospel of Jesus Christ, the Son of God.
2 Even as it is written in Isaiah the prophet, Behold, I send my messenger
before thy face, Who shall prepare thy way.
3 The voice of one crying in the wilderness, Make ye ready the way of the Lord,
Make his paths straight;
4 John came, who baptized in the wilderness and preached the baptism of
repentance unto remission of sins.
5 And there went out unto him all the country of Judaea, and all they of
Jerusalem; And they were baptized of him in the river Jordan, confessing their
sins.
6 And John was clothed with camel's hair, and [had] a leathern girdle about his
loins, and did eat locusts and wild honey.
7 And he preached, saying, There cometh after me he that is mightier than I, the
latchet of whose shoes I am not worthy to stoop down and unloose.
8 I baptized you in water; But he shall baptize you in the Holy Spirit.
9 And it came to pass in those days, that Jesus came from Nazareth of Galilee,
and was baptized of John in the Jordan.
10 And straightway coming up out of the water, he saw the heavens rent asunder,
and the Spirit as a dove descending upon him:
11 And a voice came out of the heavens, Thou art my beloved Son, in thee I am
well pleased.
12 And straightway the Spirit driveth him forth into the wilderness.
13 And he was in the wilderness forty days tempted of Satan; And he was with the
wild beasts; And the angels ministered unto him.
14 Now after John was delivered up, Jesus came into Galilee, preaching the
gospel of God,
15 and saying, The time is fulfilled, and the kingdom of God is at hand: repent
ye, and believe in the gospel.
16 And passing along by the sea of Galilee, he saw Simon and Andrew the brother
of Simon casting a net in the sea; for they were fishers.
17 And Jesus said unto them, Come ye after me, and I will make you to become
fishers of men.
18 And straightway they left the nets, and followed him.
19 And going on a little further, he saw James the [son] of Zebedee, and John
his brother, who also were in the boat mending the nets.
20 And straightway he called them: and they left their father Zebedee in the
boat with the hired servants, and went after him.
21 And they go into Capernaum; and straightway on the sabbath day he entered
into the synagogue and taught.
22 And they were astonished at his teaching: For he taught them as having
authority, and not as the scribes.
23 And straightway there was in their synagogue a man with an unclean spirit;
and he cried out,
24 saying, What have we to do with thee, Jesus thou Nazarene? art thou come to
destroy us? I know thee who thou art, the Holy One of God.
25 And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him.
26 And the unclean spirit, tearing him and crying with a loud voice, came out of
him.
27 And they were all amazed, insomuch that they questioned among themselves,
saying, What is this? a new teaching! with authority he commandeth even the
unclean spirits, and they obey him.
28 And the report of him went out straightway everywhere into all the region of
Galilee round about.
29 And straightway, when they were come out of the synagogue, they came into the
house of Simon and Andrew, with James and John.
30 Now Simon's wife's mother lay sick of a fever; and straightway they tell him
of her:
31 and he came and took her by the hand, and raised her up; and the fever left
her, and she ministered unto them.
32 And at even, when the sun did set, they brought unto him all that were sick,
and them that were possessed with demons.
33 And all the city was gathered together at the door.
34 And he healed many that were sick with divers diseases, and cast out many
demons; and he suffered not the demons to speak, because they knew him .
35 And in the morning, a great while before day, he rose up and went out, and
departed into a desert place, and there prayed.
36 And Simon and they that were with him followed after him;
37 and they found him, and say unto him, All are seeking thee.
38 And he saith unto them, Let us go elsewhere into the next towns, that I may
preach there also; for to this end came I forth.
39 And he went into their synagogues throughout all Galilee, preaching and
casting out demons.
40 And there cometh to him a leper, beseeching him, and kneeling down to him,
and saying unto him, If thou wilt, thou canst make me clean.
41 And being moved with compassion, he stretched forth his hand, and touched
him, and saith unto him, I will; be thou made clean.
42 And straightway the leprosy departed from him, and he was made clean.
43 And he strictly charged him, and straightway sent him out,
44 and saith unto him, See thou say nothing to any man: but go show thyself to
the priest, and offer for thy cleansing the things which Moses commanded, for a
testimony unto them.
45 But he went out, and began to publish it much, and to spread abroad the
matter, insomuch that Jesus could no more openly enter into a city, but was
without in desert places: and they came to him from every quarter.

Chapter 2

1 And when he entered again into Capernaum after some days, it was noised that
he was in the house.
2 And many were gathered together, so that there was no longer room [for them],
no, not even about the door: and he spake the word unto them.
3 And they come, bringing unto him a man sick of the palsy, borne of four.
4 And when they could not come nigh unto him for the crowd, they uncovered the
roof where he was: and when they had broken it up, they let down the bed whereon
the sick of the palsy lay.
5 And Jesus seeing their faith saith unto the sick of the palsy, Son, thy sins
are forgiven.
6 But there were certain of the scribes sitting there, and reasoning in their
hearts,
7 Why doth this man thus speak? he blasphemeth: who can forgive sins but one,
[even] God?
8 And straightway Jesus, perceiving in his spirit that they so reasoned within
themselves, saith unto them, Why reason ye these things in your hearts?
9 Which is easier, to say to the sick of the palsy, Thy sins are forgiven; or to
say, Arise, and take up thy bed, and walk?
10 But that ye may know that the Son of man hath authority on earth to forgive
sins (he saith to the sick of the palsy),
11 I say unto thee, Arise, take up thy bed, and go unto thy house.
12 And he arose, and straightway took up the bed, and went forth before them
all; insomuch that they were all amazed, and glorified God, saying, We never saw
it on this fashion.
13 And he went forth again by the sea side; and all the multitude resorted unto
him, and he taught them.
14 And as he passed by, he saw Levi the [son] of Alphaeus sitting at the place
of toll, and he saith unto him, Follow me. And he arose and followed him.
15 And it came to pass, that he was sitting at meat in his house, and many
publicans and sinners sat down with Jesus and his disciples: for there were
many, and they followed him.
16 And the scribes of the Pharisees, when they saw that he was eating with the
sinners and publicans, said unto his disciples, [How is it] that he eateth and
drinketh with publicans and sinners?
17 And when Jesus heard it, he saith unto them, They that are whole have no need
of a physician, but they that are sick: I came not to call the righteous, but
sinners.
18 And John's disciples and the Pharisees were fasting: and they come and say
unto him, Why do John's disciples and the disciples of the Pharisees fast, but
thy disciples fast not?
19 And Jesus said unto them, Can the sons of the bridechamber fast, while the
bridegroom is with them? as long as they have the bridegroom with them, they
cannot fast.
20 But the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken away from them,
and then will they fast in that day.
21 No man seweth a piece of undressed cloth on an old garment: else that which
should fill it up taketh from it, the new from the old, and a worse rent is
made.
22 And no man putteth new wine into old wine-skins; else the wine will burst the
skins, and the wine perisheth, and the skins: but [they put] new wine into fresh
wine-skins.
23 And it came to pass, that he was going on the sabbath day through the
grainfields; and his disciples began, as they went, to pluck the ears.
24 And the Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that
which is not lawful?
25 And he said unto them, Did ye never read what David did, when he had need,
and was hungry, he, and they that were with him?
26 How he entered into the house of God when Abiathar was high priest, and ate
the showbread, which it is not lawful to eat save for the priests, and gave also
to them that were with him?
27 And he said unto them, The sabbath was made for man, and not man for the
sabbath:
28 so that the Son of man is lord even of the sabbath.

Chapter 3

1 And he entered again into the synagogue; and there was a man there who had his
hand withered.
2 And they watched him, whether he would heal him on the sabbath day; that they
might accuse him.
3 And he saith unto the man that had his hand withered, Stand forth.
4 And he saith unto them, Is it lawful on the sabbath day to do good, or to do
harm? to save a life, or to kill? But they held their peace.
5 And when he had looked round about on them with anger, being grieved at the
hardening of their heart, he saith unto the man, Stretch forth thy hand. And he
stretched it forth; and his hand was restored.
6 And the Pharisees went out, and straightway with the Herodians took counsel
against him, how they might destroy him.
7 And Jesus with his disciples withdrew to the sea: and a great multitude from
Galilee followed; and from Judaea,
8 and from Jerusalem, and from Idumaea, and beyond the Jordan, and about Tyre
and Sidon, a great multitude, hearing what great things he did, came unto him.
9 And he spake to his disciples, that a little boat should wait on him because
of the crowd, lest they should throng him:
10 for he had healed many; insomuch that as many as had plagues pressed upon him
that they might touch him.
11 And the unclean spirits, whensoever they beheld him, fell down before him,
and cried, saying, Thou art the Son of God.
12 And he charged them much that they should not make him known.
13 And he goeth up into the mountain, and calleth unto him whom he himself
would; and they went unto him.
14 And he appointed twelve, that they might be with him, and that he might send
them forth to preach,
15 and to have authority to cast out demons:
16 and Simon he surnamed Peter;
17 and James the [son] of Zebedee, and John the brother of James; and them he
surnamed Boanerges, which is, Sons of thunder:
18 and Andrew, and Philip, and Bartholomew, and Matthew, and Thomas, and James
the [son] of Alphaeus, and Thaddaeus, and Simon the Cananaean,
19 and Judas Iscariot, who also betrayed him. And he cometh into a house.
20 And the multitude cometh together again, so that they could not so much as
eat bread.
21 And when his friends heard it, they went out to lay hold on him: for they
said, He is beside himself.
22 And the scribes that came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and,
By the prince of the demons casteth he out the demons.
23 And he called them unto him, and said unto them in parables, How can Satan
cast out Satan?
24 And if a kingdom be divided against itself, that kingdom cannot stand.
25 And if a house be divided against itself, that house will not be able to
stand.
26 And if Satan hath risen up against himself, and is divided, he cannot stand,
but hath an end.
27 But no one can enter into the house of the strong [man], and spoil his goods,
except he first bind the strong [man] ; and then he will spoil his house.
28 Verily I say unto you, All their sins shall be forgiven unto the sons of men,
and their blasphemies wherewith soever they shall blaspheme:
29 but whosoever shall blaspheme against the Holy Spirit hath never forgiveness,
but is guilty of an eternal sin:
30 because they said, He hath an unclean spirit.
31 And there come his mother and his brethren; and, standing without, they sent
unto him, calling him.
32 And a multitude was sitting about him; and they say unto him, Behold, thy
mother and thy brethren without seek for thee.
33 And he answereth them, and saith, Who is my mother and my brethren?
34 And looking round on them that sat round about him, he saith, Behold, my
mother and my brethren!
35 For whosoever shall do the will of God, the same is my brother, and sister,
and mother.

Chapter 4

1 And again he began to teach by the sea side. And there is gathered unto him a
very great multitude, so that he entered into a boat, and sat in the sea; and
all the multitude were by the sea on the land.
2 And he taught them many things in parables, and said unto them in his
teaching,
3 Hearken: Behold, the sower went forth to sow:
4 and it came to pass, as he sowed, some [seed] fell by the way side, and the
birds came and devoured it.
5 And other fell on the rocky [ground], where it had not much earth; and
straightway it sprang up, because it had no deepness of earth:
6 and when the sun was risen, it was scorched; and because it had no root, it
withered away.
7 And other fell among the thorns, and the thorns grew up, and choked it, and it
yielded no fruit.
8 And others fell into the good ground, and yielded fruit, growing up and
increasing; and brought forth, thirtyfold, and sixtyfold, and a hundredfold.
9 And he said, Who hath ears to hear, let him hear.
10 And when he was alone, they that were about him with the twelve asked of him
the parables.
11 And he said unto them, Unto you is given the mystery of the kingdom of God:
but unto them that are without, all things are done in parables:
12 that seeing they may see, and not perceive; and hearing they may hear, and
not understand; lest haply they should turn again, and it should be forgiven
them.
13 And he saith unto them, Know ye not this parable? and how shall ye know all
the parables?
14 The sower soweth the word.
15 And these are they by the way side, where the word is sown; and when they
have heard, straightway cometh Satan, and taketh away the word which hath been
sown in them.
16 And these in like manner are they that are sown upon the rocky [places], who,
when they have heard the word, straightway receive it with joy;
17 and they have no root in themselves, but endure for a while; then, when
tribulation or persecution ariseth because of the word, straightway they
stumble.
18 And others are they that are sown among the thorns; these are they that have
heard the word,
19 and the cares of the world, and the deceitfulness of riches, and the lusts of
other things entering in, choke the word, and it becometh unfruitful.
20 And those are they that were sown upon the good ground; such as hear the
word, and accept it, and bear fruit, thirtyfold, and sixtyfold, and a
hundredfold.
21 And he said unto them, Is the lamp brought to be put under the bushel, or
under the bed, [and] not to be put on the stand?
22 For there is nothing hid, save that it should be manifested; neither was
[anything] made secret, but that it should come to light.
23 If any man hath ears to hear, let him hear.
24 And he said unto them, Take heed what ye hear: with what measure ye mete it
shall be measured unto you; and more shall be given unto you.
25 For he that hath, to him shall be given: and he that hath not, from him shall
be taken away even that which he hath.
26 And he said, So is the kingdom of God, as if a man should cast seed upon the
earth;
27 and should sleep and rise night and day, and the seed should spring up and
grow, he knoweth not how.
28 The earth beareth fruit of herself; first the blade, then the ear, then the
full grain in the ear.
29 But when the fruit is ripe, straightway he putteth forth the sickle, because
the harvest is come.
30 And he said, How shall we liken the kingdom of God? or in what parable shall
we set it forth?
31 It is like a grain of mustard seed, which, when it is sown upon the earth,
though it be less than all the seeds that are upon the earth,
32 yet when it is sown, groweth up, and becometh greater than all the herbs, and
putteth out great branches; so that the birds of the heaven can lodge under the
shadow thereof.
33 And with many such parables spake he the word unto them, as they were able to
hear it;
34 and without a parable spake he not unto them: but privately to his own
disciples he expounded all things.
35 And on that day, when even was come, he saith unto them, Let us go over unto
the other side.
36 And leaving the multitude, they take him with them, even as he was, in the
boat. And other boats were with him.
37 And there ariseth a great storm of wind, and the waves beat into the boat,
insomuch that the boat was now filling.
38 And he himself was in the stern, asleep on the cushion: and they awake him,
and say unto him, Teacher, carest thou not that we perish?
39 And he awoke, and rebuked the wind, and said unto the sea, Peace, be still.
And the wind ceased, and there was a great calm.
40 And he said unto them, Why are ye fearful? have ye not yet faith?
41 And they feared exceedingly, and said one to another, Who then is this, that
even the wind and the sea obey him?

Chapter 5

1 And they came to the other side of the sea, into the country of the Gerasenes.
2 And when he was come out of the boat, straightway there met him out of the
tombs a man with an unclean spirit,
3 who had his dwelling in the tombs: and no man could any more bind him, no, not
with a chain;
4 because that he had been often bound with fetters and chains, and the chains
had been rent asunder by him, and the fetters broken in pieces: and no man had
strength to tame him.
5 And always, night and day, in the tombs and in the mountains, he was crying
out, and cutting himself with stones.
6 And when he saw Jesus from afar, he ran and worshipped him;
7 and crying out with a loud voice, he saith, What have I to do with thee,
Jesus, thou Son of the Most High God? I adjure thee by God, torment me not.
8 For he said unto him, Come forth, thou unclean spirit, out of the man.
9 And he asked him, What is thy name? And he saith unto him, My name is Legion;
for we are many.
10 And he besought him much that he would not send them away out of the country.
11 Now there was there on the mountain side a great herd of swine feeding.
12 And they besought him, saying, Send us into the swine, that we may enter into
them.
13 And he gave them leave. And the unclean spirits came out, and entered into
the swine: and the herd rushed down the steep into the sea, [in number] about
two thousand; and they were drowned in the sea.
14 And they that fed them fled, and told it in the city, and in the country. And
they came to see what it was that had come to pass.
15 And they come to Jesus, and behold him that was possessed with demons
sitting, clothed and in his right mind, [even] him that had the legion: and they
were afraid.
16 And they that saw it declared unto them how it befell him that was possessed
with demons, and concerning the swine.
17 And they began to beseech him to depart from their borders.
18 And as he was entering into the boat, he that had been possessed with demons
besought him that he might be with him.
19 And he suffered him not, but saith unto him, Go to thy house unto thy
friends, and tell them how great things the Lord hath done for thee, and [how]
he had mercy on thee.
20 And he went his way, and began to publish in Decapolis how great things Jesus
had done for him: and all men marvelled.
21 And when Jesus had crossed over again in the boat unto the other side, a
great multitude was gathered unto him; and he was by the sea.
22 And there cometh one of the rulers of the synagogue, Jairus by name; and
seeing him, he falleth at his feet,
23 and beseecheth him much, saying, My little daughter is at the point of death:
[I pray thee], that thou come and lay thy hands on her, that she may be made
whole, and live.
24 And he went with him; and a great multitude followed him, and they thronged
him.
25 And a woman, who had an issue of blood twelve years,
26 and had suffered many things of many physicians, and had spent all that she
had, and was nothing bettered, but rather grew worse,
27 having heard the things concerning Jesus, came in the crowd behind, and
touched his garment.
28 For she said, If I touch but his garments, I shall be made whole.
29 And straightway the fountain of her blood was dried up; and she felt in her
body that she was healed of her plague.
30 And straightway Jesus, perceiving in himself that the power [proceeding] from
him had gone forth, turned him about in the crowd, and said, Who touched my
garments?
31 And his disciples said unto him, Thou seest the multitude thronging thee, and
sayest thou, Who touched me?
32 And he looked round about to see her that had done this thing.
33 But the woman fearing and trembling, knowing what had been done to her, came
and fell down before him, and told him all the truth.
34 And he said unto her, Daughter, thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace,
and be whole of thy plague.
35 While he yet spake, they come from the ruler of the synagogue's [house]
saying, Thy daughter is dead: why troublest thou the Teacher any further?
36 But Jesus, not heeding the word spoken, saith unto the ruler of the
synagogue, Fear not, only believe.
37 And he suffered no man to follow with him, save Peter, and James, and John
the brother of James.
38 And they come to the house of the ruler of the synagogue; and he beholdeth a
tumult, and [many] weeping and wailing greatly.
39 And when he was entered in, he saith unto them, Why make ye a tumult, and
weep? the child is not dead, but sleepeth.
40 And they laughed him to scorn. But he, having put them all forth, taketh the
father of the child and her mother and them that were with him, and goeth in
where the child was.
41 And taking the child by the hand, he saith unto her, Talitha cumi; which is,
being interpreted, Damsel, I say unto thee, Arise.
42 And straightway the damsel rose up, and walked; for she was twelve years old.
And they were amazed straightway with a great amazement.
43 And he charged them much that no man should know this: and he commanded that
[something] should be given her to eat.

Chapter 6

1 And he went out from thence; and he cometh into his own country; and his
disciples follow him.
2 And when the sabbath was come, he began to teach in the synagogue: and many
hearing him were astonished, saying, Whence hath this man these things? and,
What is the wisdom that is given unto this man, and [what mean] such mighty
works wrought by his hands?
3 Is not this the carpenter, the son of Mary, and brother of James, and Joses,
and Judas, and Simon? and are not his sisters here with us? And they were
offended in him. [
4 And Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honor, save in his own
country, and among his own kin, and in his own house.
5 And he could there do no mighty work, save that he laid his hands upon a few
sick folk, and healed them.
6 And he marvelled because of their unbelief. And he went round about the
villages teaching.
7 And he calleth unto him the twelve, and began to send them forth by two and
two; and he gave them authority over the unclean spirits;
8 and he charged them that they should take nothing for [their] journey, save a
staff only; no bread, no wallet, no money in their purse;
9 but [to go] shod with sandals: and, [said he], put not on two coats.
10 And he said unto them, Wheresoever ye enter into a house, there abide till ye
depart thence.
11 And whatsoever place shall not receive you, and they hear you not, as ye go
forth thence, shake off the dust that is under your feet for a testimony unto
them.
12 And they went out, and preached that [men] should repent.
13 And they cast out many demons, and anointed with oil many that were sick, and
healed them.
14 And king Herod heard [thereof] ; for his name had become known: and he said,
John the Baptizer is risen from the dead, and therefore do these powers work in
him.
15 But others said, It is Elijah. And others said, [It is] a prophet, [even] as
one of the prophets.
16 But Herod, when he heard [thereof], said, John, whom I beheaded, he is risen.
17 For Herod himself had sent forth and laid hold upon John, and bound him in
prison for the sake of Herodias, his brother Philip's wife; for he had married
her.
18 For John said unto Herod, It is not lawful for thee to have thy brother's
wife.
19 And Herodias set herself against him, and desired to kill him; and she could
not;
20 for Herod feared John, knowing that he was a righteous and holy man, and kept
him safe. And when he heard him, he was much perplexed; and he heard him gladly.
21 And when a convenient day was come, that Herod on his birthday made a supper
to his lords, and the high captains, and the chief men of Galilee;
22 and when the daughter of Herodias herself came in and danced, she pleased
Herod and them that sat at meat with him; and the king said unto the damsel, Ask
of me whatsoever thou wilt, and I will give it thee.
23 And he sware unto her, Whatsoever thou shalt ask of me, I will give it thee,
unto the half of my kingdom.
24 And she went out, and said unto her mother, What shall I ask? And she said,
The head of John the Baptizer.
25 And she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked, saying, I
will that thou forthwith give me on a platter the head of John the Baptist.
26 And the king was exceeding sorry; but for the sake of his oaths, and of them
that sat at meat, he would not reject her.
27 And straightway the king sent forth a soldier of his guard, and commanded to
bring his head: and he went and beheaded him in the prison,
28 and brought his head on a platter, and gave it to the damsel; and the damsel
gave it to her mother.
29 And when his disciples heard [thereof], they came and took up his corpse, and
laid it in a tomb.
30 And the apostles gather themselves together unto Jesus; and they told him all
things, whatsoever they had done, and whatsoever they had taught.
31 And he saith unto them, Come ye yourselves apart into a desert place, and
rest a while. For there were many coming and going, and they had no leisure so
much as to eat.
32 And they went away in the boat to a desert place apart.
33 And [the people] saw them going, and many knew [them], and they ran together
there on foot from all the cities, and outwent them.
34 And he came forth and saw a great multitude, and he had compassion on them,
because they were as sheep not having a shepherd: and he began to teach them
many things.
35 And when the day was now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said,
The place is desert, and the day is now far spent;
36 send them away, that they may go into the country and villages round about,
and buy themselves somewhat to eat.
37 But he answered and said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they say unto
him, Shall we go and buy two hundred shillings' worth of bread, and give them to
eat?
38 And he saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? go [and] see. And when they
knew, they say, Five, and two fishes.
39 And he commanded them that all should sit down by companies upon the green
grass.
40 And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds, and by fifties.
41 And he took the five loaves and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he
blessed, and brake the loaves; and he gave to the disciples to set before them;
and the two fishes divided he among them all.
42 And they all ate, and were filled.
43 And they took up broken pieces, twelve basketfuls, and also of the fishes.
44 And they that ate the loaves were five thousand men.
45 And straightway he constrained his disciples to enter into the boat, and to
go before [him] unto the other side to Bethsaida, while he himself sendeth the
multitude away.
46 And after he had taken leave of them, he departed into the mountain to pray.
47 And when even was come, the boat was in the midst of the sea, and he alone on
the land.
48 And seeing them distressed in rowing, for the wind was contrary unto them,
about the fourth watch of the night he cometh unto them, walking on the sea; and
he would have passed by them:
49 but they, when they saw him walking on the sea, supposed that it was a ghost,
and cried out;
50 for they all saw him, and were troubled. But he straightway spake with them,
and saith unto them, Be of good cheer: it is I; be not afraid.
51 And he went up unto them into the boat; and the wind ceased: and they were
sore amazed in themselves;
52 for they understood not concerning the loaves, but their heart was hardened.
53 And when they had crossed over, they came to the land unto Gennesaret, and
moored to the shore.
54 And when they were come out of the boat, straightway [the people] knew him,
55 and ran round about that whole region, and began to carry about on their beds
those that were sick, where they heard he was.
56 And wheresoever he entered, into villages, or into cities, or into the
country, they laid the sick in the marketplaces, and besought him that they
might touch if it were but the border of his garment: and as many as touched him
were made whole.

Chapter 7

1 And there are gathered together unto him the Pharisees, and certain of the
scribes, who had come from Jerusalem,
2 and had seen that some of his disciples ate their bread with defiled, that is,
unwashen, hands.
3 (For the Pharisees, and all the Jews, except they wash their hands diligently,
eat not, holding the tradition of the elders;
4 and [when they come] from the marketplace, except they bathe themselves, they
eat not; and many other things there are, which they have received to hold,
washings of cups, and pots, and brasen vessels .)
5 And the Pharisees and the scribes ask him, Why walk not thy disciples
according to the tradition of the elders, but eat their bread with defiled
hands?
6 And he said unto them, Well did Isaiah prophesy of you hypocrites, as it is
written, This people honoreth me with their lips, But their heart is far from
me.
7 But in vain do they worship me, Teaching [as their] doctrines the precepts of
men.
8 Ye leave the commandment of God, and hold fast the tradition of men.
9 And he said unto them, Full well do ye reject the commandment of God, that ye
may keep your tradition.
10 For Moses said, Honor thy father and thy mother; and, He that speaketh evil
of father or mother, let him die the death:
11 but ye say, If a man shall say to his father or his mother, That wherewith
thou mightest have been profited by me is Corban, that is to say, Given [to God]
;
12 ye no longer suffer him to do aught for his father or his mother;
13 making void the word of God by your tradition, which ye have delivered: and
many such like things ye do.
14 And he called to him the multitude again, and said unto them, Hear me all of
you, and understand:
15 there is nothing from without the man, that going into him can defile him;
but the things which proceed out of the man are those that defile the man.
16 (Ommitted)
17 And when he was entered into the house from the multitude, his disciples
asked of him the parable.
18 And he saith unto them, Are ye so without understanding also? Perceive ye
not, that whatsoever from without goeth into the man, [it] cannot defile him;
19 because it goeth not into his heart, but into his belly, and goeth out into
the draught? [This he said], making all meats clean.
20 And he said, That which proceedeth out of the man, that defileth the man.
21 For from within, out of the heart of men, evil thoughts proceed,
fornications, thefts, murders, adulteries,
22 covetings, wickednesses, deceit, lasciviousness, an evil eye, railing, pride,
foolishness:
23 all these evil things proceed from within, and defile the man.
24 And from thence he arose, and went away into the borders of Tyre and Sidon.
And he entered into a house, and would have no man know it; and he could not be
hid.
25 But straightway a woman, whose little daughter had an unclean spirit, having
heard of him, came and fell down at his feet.
26 Now the woman was a Greek, a Syrophoenician by race. And she besought him
that he would cast forth the demon out of her daughter.
27 And he said unto her, Let the children first be filled: for it is not meet to
take the children's bread and cast it to the dogs.
28 But she answered and saith unto him, Yea, Lord; even the dogs under the table
eat of the children's crumbs.
29 And he said unto her, For this saying go thy way; the demon is gone out of
thy daughter.
30 And she went away unto her house, and found the child laid upon the bed, and
the demon gone out.
31 And again he went out from the borders of Tyre, and came through Sidon unto
the sea of Galilee, through the midst of the borders of Decapolis.
32 And they bring unto him one that was deaf, and had an impediment in his
speech; and they beseech him to lay his hand upon him.
33 And he took him aside from the multitude privately, and put his fingers into
his ears, and he spat, and touched his tongue;
34 and looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is,
Be opened.
35 And his ears were opened, and the bond of his tongue was loosed, and he spake
plain.
36 And he charged them that they should tell no man: but the more he charged
them, so much the more a great deal they published it.
37 And they were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hath done all things
well; he maketh even the deaf to hear, and the dumb to speak.

Chapter 8

1 In those days, when there was again a great multitude, and they had nothing to
eat, he called unto him his disciples, and saith unto them,
2 I have compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three
days, and have nothing to eat:
3 and if I send them away fasting to their home, they will faint on the way; and
some of them are come from far.
4 And his disciples answered him, Whence shall one be able to fill these men
with bread here in a desert place?
5 And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven.
6 And he commandeth the multitude to sit down on the ground: and he took the
seven loaves, and having given thanks, he brake, and gave to his disciples, to
set before them; and they set them before the multitude.
7 And they had a few small fishes: and having blessed them, he commanded to set
these also before them.
8 And they ate, and were filled: and they took up, of broken pieces that
remained over, seven baskets.
9 And they were about four thousand: and he sent them away.
10 And straightway he entered into the boat with his disciples, and came into
the parts of Dalmanutha.
11 And the Pharisees came forth, and began to question with him, seeking of him
a sign from heaven, trying him.
12 And he sighed deeply in his spirit, and saith, Why doth this generation seek
a sign? verily I say unto you, There shall no sign be given unto this
generation.
13 And he left them, and again entering into [the boat] departed to the other
side.
14 And they forgot to take bread; and they had not in the boat with them more
than one loaf.
15 And he charged them, saying, Take heed, beware of the leaven of the Pharisees
and the leaven of Herod.
16 And they reasoned one with another, saying, We have no bread.
17 And Jesus perceiving it saith unto them, Why reason ye, because ye have no
bread? do ye not yet perceive, neither understand? have ye your heart hardened?
18 Having eyes, see ye not? and having ears, hear ye not? and do ye not
remember?
19 When I brake the five loaves among the five thousand, how many baskets full
of broken pieces took ye up? They say unto him, Twelve.
20 And when the seven among the four thousand, how many basketfuls of broken
pieces took ye up? And they say unto him, Seven.
21 And he said unto them, Do ye not yet understand?
22 And they come unto Bethsaida. And they bring to him a blind man, and beseech
him to touch him.
23 And he took hold of the blind man by the hand, and brought him out of the
village; and when he had spit on his eyes, and laid his hands upon him, he asked
him, Seest thou aught?
24 And he looked up, and said, I see men; for I behold [them] as trees, walking.
25 Then again he laid his hands upon his eyes; and he looked stedfastly, and was
restored, and saw all things clearly.
26 And he sent him away to his home, saying, Do not even enter into the village.
27 And Jesus went forth, and his disciples, into the villages of Caesarea
Philippi: and on the way he asked his disciples, saying unto them, Who do men
say that I am?
28 And they told him, saying, John the Baptist; and others, Elijah; but others,
One of the prophets.
29 And he asked them, But who say ye that I am? Peter answereth and saith unto
him, Thou art the Christ.
30 And he charged them that they should tell no man of him.
31 And he began to teach them, that the Son of man must suffer many things, and
be rejected by the elders, and the chief priests, and the scribes, and be
killed, and after three days rise again.
32 And he spake the saying openly. And Peter took him, and began to rebuke him.
33 But he turning about, and seeing his disciples, rebuked Peter, and saith, Get
thee behind me, Satan; for thou mindest not the things of God, but the things of
men.
34 And he called unto him the multitude with his disciples, and said unto them,
If any man would come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and
follow me.
35 For whosoever would save his life shall lose it; and whosoever shall lose his
life for my sake and the gospel's shall save it.
36 For what doth it profit a man, to gain the whole world, and forfeit his life?
37 For what should a man give in exchange for his life?
38 For whosoever shall be ashamed of me and of my words in this adulterous and
sinful generation, the Son of man also shall be ashamed of him, when he cometh
in the glory of his Father with the holy angels.

Chapter 9

1 And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, There are some here of them that
stand [by], who shall in no wise taste of death, till they see the kingdom of
God come with power.
2 And after six days Jesus taketh with him Peter, and James, and John, and
bringeth them up into a high mountain apart by themselves: and he was
transfigured before them;
3 and his garments became glistering, exceeding white, so as no fuller on earth
can whiten them.
4 And there appeared unto them Elijah with Moses: and they were talking with
Jesus.
5 And Peter answereth and saith to Jesus, Rabbi, it is good for us to be here:
and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for
Elijah.
6 For he knew not what to answer; for they became sore afraid.
7 And there came a cloud overshadowing them: and there came a voice out of the
cloud, This is my beloved Son: hear ye him.
8 And suddenly looking round about, they saw no one any more, save Jesus only
with themselves.
9 And as they were coming down from the mountain, he charged them that they
should tell no man what things they had seen, save when the Son of man should
have risen again from the dead.
10 And they kept the saying, questioning among themselves what the rising again
from the dead should mean.
11 And they asked him, saying, [How is it] that the scribes say that Elijah must
first come?
12 And he said unto them, Elijah indeed cometh first, and restoreth all things:
and how is it written of the Son of man, that he should suffer many things and
be set at nought?
13 But I say unto you, that Elijah is come, and they have also done unto him
whatsoever they would, even as it is written of him.
14 And when they came to the disciples, they saw a great multitude about them,
and scribes questioning with them.
15 And straightway all the multitude, when they saw him, were greatly amazed,
and running to him saluted him.
16 And he asked them, What question ye with them?
17 And one of the multitude answered him, Teacher, I brought unto thee my son,
who hath a dumb spirit;
18 and wheresoever it taketh him, it dasheth him down: and he foameth, and
grindeth his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they
should cast it out; and they were not able. [
19 And he answereth them and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be
with you? how long shall I bear with you? bring him unto me.
20 And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit
tare him grievously; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming.
21 And he asked his father, How long time is it since this hath come unto him?
And he said, From a child.
22 And oft-times it hath cast him both into the fire and into the waters, to
destroy him: but if thou canst do anything, have compassion on us, and help us.
23 And Jesus said unto him, If thou canst! All things are possible to him that
believeth.
24 Straightway the father of the child cried out, and said, I believe; help thou
mine unbelief.
25 And when Jesus saw that a multitude came running together, he rebuked the
unclean spirit, saying unto him, Thou dumb and deaf spirit, I command thee, come
out of him, and enter no more into him.
26 And having cried out, and torn him much, he came out: and [the boy] became as
one dead; insomuch that the more part said, He is dead.
27 But Jesus took him by the hand, and raised him up; and he arose.
28 And when he was come into the house, his disciples asked him privately, [How
is it] that we could not cast it out?
29 And he said unto them, This kind can come out by nothing, save by prayer .
30 And they went forth from thence, and passed through Galilee; and he would not
that any man should know it.
31 For he taught his disciples, and said unto them, The Son of man is delivered
up into the hands of men, and they shall kill him; and when he is killed, after
three days he shall rise again.
32 But they understood not the saying, and were afraid to ask him.
33 And they came to Capernaum: and when he was in the house he asked them, What
were ye reasoning on the way?
34 But they held their peace: for they had disputed one with another on the way,
who [was] the greatest.
35 And he sat down, and called the twelve; and he saith unto them, If any man
would be first, he shall be last of all, and servant of all.
36 And he took a little child, and set him in the midst of them: and taking him
in his arms, he said unto them,
37 Whosoever shall receive one of such little children in my name, receiveth me:
and whosoever receiveth me, receiveth not me, but him that sent me.
38 John said unto him, Teacher, we saw one casting out demons in thy name; and
we forbade him, because he followed not us.
39 But Jesus said, Forbid him not: for there is no man who shall do a mighty
work in my name, and be able quickly to speak evil of me.
40 For he that is not against us is for us.
41 For whosoever shall give you a cup of water to drink, because ye are
Christ's, verily I say unto you, he shall in no wise lose his reward.
42 And whosoever shall cause one of these little ones that believe on me to
stumble, it were better for him if a great millstone were hanged about his neck,
and he were cast into the sea.
43 And if thy hand cause thee to stumble, cut it off: it is good for thee to
enter into life maimed, rather than having thy two hands to go into hell, into
the unquenchable fire.
44 (Ommitted)
45 And if thy foot cause thee to stumble, cut it off: it is good for thee to
enter into life halt, rather than having thy two feet to be cast into hell.
46 (Ommitted)
47 And if thine eye cause thee to stumble, cast it out: it is good for thee to
enter into the kingdom of God with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be
cast into hell;
48 where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched.
49 For every one shall be salted with fire .
50 Salt is good: but if the salt have lost its saltness, wherewith will ye
season it? Have salt in yourselves, and be at peace one with another.

Chapter 10

1 And he arose from thence and cometh into the borders of Judaea and beyond the
Jordan: and multitudes come together unto him again; and, as he was wont, he
taught them again.
2 And there came unto him Pharisees, and asked him, Is it lawful for a man to
put away [his] wife? trying him.
3 And he answered and said unto them, What did Moses command you?
4 And they said, Moses suffered to write a bill of divorcement, and to put her
away.
5 But Jesus said unto them, For your hardness of heart he wrote you this
commandment.
6 But from the beginning of the creation, Male and female made he them.
7 For this cause shall a man leave his father and mother, and shall cleave to
his wife;
8 and the two shall become one flesh: so that they are no more two, but one
flesh.
9 What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder.
10 And in the house the disciples asked him again of this matter.
11 And he saith unto them, Whosoever shall put away his wife, and marry another,
committeth adultery against her:
12 and if she herself shall put away her husband, and marry another, she
committeth adultery.
13 And they were bringing unto him little children, that he should touch them:
and the disciples rebuked them.
14 But when Jesus saw it, he was moved with indignation, and said unto them,
Suffer the little children to come unto me; forbid them not: for to such
belongeth the kingdom of God.
15 Verily I say unto you, Whosoever shall not receive the kingdom of God as a
little child, he shall in no wise enter therein.
16 And he took them in his arms, and blessed them, laying his hands upon them.
17 And as he was going forth into the way, there ran one to him, and kneeled to
him, and asked him, Good Teacher, what shall I do that I may inherit eternal
life?
18 And Jesus said unto him, Why callest thou me good? none is good save one,
[even] God.
19 Thou knowest the commandments, Do not kill, Do not commit adultery, Do not
steal, Do not bear false witness, Do not defraud, Honor thy father and mother.
20 And he said unto him, Teacher, all these things have I observed from my
youth.
21 And Jesus looking upon him loved him, and said unto him, One thing thou
lackest: go, sell whatsoever thou hast, and give to the poor, and thou shalt
have treasure in heaven: and come, follow me.
22 But his countenance fell at the saying, and he went away sorrowful: for he
was one that had great possessions.
23 And Jesus looked round about, and saith unto his disciples, How hardly shall
they that have riches enter into the kingdom of God!
24 And the disciples were amazed at his words. But Jesus answereth again, and
saith unto them, Children, how hard is it for them that trust in riches to enter
into the kingdom of God!
25 It is easier for a camel to go through a needle's eye, than for a rich man to
enter into the kingdom of God.
26 And they were astonished exceedingly, saying unto him, Then who can be saved?
27 Jesus looking upon them saith, With men it is impossible, but not with God:
for all things are possible with God.
28 Peter began to say unto him, Lo, we have left all, and have followed thee.
29 Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left house, or
brethren, or sisters, or mother, or father, or children, or lands, for my sake,
and for the gospel's sake,
30 but he shall receive a hundredfold now in this time, houses, and brethren,
and sisters, and mothers, and children, and lands, with persecutions; and in the
world to come eternal life.
31 But many [that are] first shall be last; and the last first.
32 And they were on the way, going up to Jerusalem; and Jesus was going before
them: and they were amazed; and they that followed were afraid. And he took
again the twelve, and began to tell them the things that were to happen unto
him,
33 [ saying], Behold, we go up to Jerusalem; and the Son of man shall be
delivered unto the chief priests and the scribes; and they shall condemn him to
death, and shall deliver him unto the Gentiles:
34 and they shall mock him, and shall spit upon him, and shall scourge him, and
shall kill him; and after three days he shall rise again.
35 And there come near unto him James and John, the sons of Zebedee, saying unto
him, Teacher, we would that thou shouldest do for us whatsoever we shall ask of
thee.
36 And he said unto them, What would ye that I should do for you?
37 And they said unto him, Grant unto us that we may sit, one on thy right hand,
and one on [thy] left hand, in thy glory.
38 But Jesus said unto them, Ye know not what ye ask. Are ye able to drink the
cup that I drink? or to be baptized with the baptism that I am baptized with?
39 And they said unto him, We are able. And Jesus said unto them, The cup that I
drink ye shall drink; and with the baptism that I am baptized withal shall ye be
baptized:
40 but to sit on my right hand or on [my] left hand is not mine to give; but [it
is for them] for whom it hath been prepared.
41 And when the ten heard it, they began to be moved with indignation concerning
James and John.
42 And Jesus called them to him, and saith unto them, Ye know that they who are
accounted to rule over the Gentiles lord it over them; and their great ones
exercise authority over them.
43 But it is not so among you: but whosoever would become great among you, shall
be your minister;
44 and whosoever would be first among you, shall be servant of all.
45 For the Son of man also came not to be ministered unto, but to minister, and
to give his life a ransom for many.
46 And they come to Jericho: and as he went out from Jericho, with his disciples
and a great multitude, the son of Timaeus, Bartimaeus, a blind beggar, was
sitting by the way side.
47 And when he heard that it was Jesus the Nazarene, he began to cry out, and
say, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on me.
48 And many rebuked him, that he should hold his peace: but he cried out the
more a great deal, Thou son of David, have mercy on me.
49 And Jesus stood still, and said, Call ye him. And they call the blind man,
saying unto him, Be of good cheer: rise, he calleth thee.
50 And he, casting away his garment, sprang up, and came to Jesus.
51 And Jesus answered him, and said, What wilt thou that I should do unto thee?
And the blind man said unto him, Rabboni, that I may receive my sight.
52 And Jesus said unto him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee whole. And
straightway he received his sight, and followed him in the way.

Chapter 11

1 And when they draw nigh unto Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the
mount of Olives, he sendeth two of his disciples,
2 and saith unto them, Go your way into the village that is over against you:
and straightway as ye enter into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon no man
ever yet sat; loose him, and bring him.
3 And if any one say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye, The Lord hath need of
him; and straightway he will send him back hither.
4 And they went away, and found a colt tied at the door without in the open
street; and they loose him.
5 And certain of them that stood there said unto them, What do ye, loosing the
colt?
6 And they said unto them even as Jesus had said: and they let them go.
7 And they bring the colt unto Jesus, and cast on him their garments; and he sat
upon him.
8 And many spread their garments upon the way; and others branches, which they
had cut from the fields.
9 And they that went before, and they that followed, cried, Hosanna; Blessed
[is] he that cometh in the name of the Lord:
10 Blessed [is] the kingdom that cometh, [the kingdom] of our father David:
Hosanna in the highest.
11 And he entered into Jerusalem, into the temple; and when he had looked round
about upon all things, it being now eventide, he went out unto Bethany with the
twelve.
12 And on the morrow, when they were come out from Bethany, he hungered.
13 And seeing a fig tree afar off having leaves, he came, if haply he might find
anything thereon: and when he came to it, he found nothing but leaves; for it
was not the season of figs.
14 And he answered and said unto it, No man eat fruit from thee henceforward for
ever. And his disciples heard it.
15 And they come to Jerusalem: and he entered into the temple, and began to cast
out them that sold and them that bought in the temple, and overthrew the tables
of the money-changers, and the seats of them that sold the doves;
16 and he would not suffer that any man should carry a vessel through the
temple.
17 And he taught, and said unto them, Is it not written, My house shall be
called a house of prayer for all the nations? but ye have made it a den of
robbers.
18 And the chief priests and the scribes heard it, and sought how they might
destroy him: for they feared him, for all the multitude was astonished at his
teaching.
19 And every evening he went forth out of the city.
20 And as they passed by in the morning, they saw the fig tree withered away
from the roots.
21 And Peter calling to remembrance saith unto him, Rabbi, behold, the fig tree
which thou cursedst is withered away.
22 And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God.
23 Verily I say unto you, Whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou taken
up and cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe
that what he saith cometh to pass; he shall have it.
24 Therefore I say unto you, All things whatsoever ye pray and ask for, believe
that ye receive them, and ye shall have them.
25 And whensoever ye stand praying, forgive, if ye have aught against any one;
that your Father also who is in heaven may forgive you your trespasses.
26 (Ommitted)
27 And they come again to Jerusalem: and as he was walking in the temple, there
come to him the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders;
28 and they said unto him, By what authority doest thou these things? or who
gave thee this authority to do these things?
29 And Jesus said unto them, I will ask of you one question, and answer me, and
I will tell you by what authority I do these things.
30 The baptism of John, was it from heaven, or from men? answer me.
31 And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; He
will say, Why then did ye not believe him?
32 But should we say, From men--they feared the people: for all verily held John
to be a prophet.
33 And they answered Jesus and say, We know not. And Jesus saith unto them,
Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things.

Chapter 12

1 And he began to speak unto them in parables. A man planted a vineyard, and set
a hedge about it, and digged a pit for the winepress, and built a tower, and let
it out to husbandmen, and went into another country.
2 And at the season he sent to the husbandmen a servant, that he might receive
from the husbandmen of the fruits of the vineyard.
3 And they took him, and beat him, and sent him away empty.
4 And again he sent unto them another servant; and him they wounded in the head,
and handled shamefully.
5 And he sent another; and him they killed: and many others; beating some, and
killing some.
6 He had yet one, a beloved son: he sent him last unto them, saying, They will
reverence my son.
7 But those husbandmen said among themselves, This is the heir; come, let us
kill him, and the inheritance shall be ours.
8 And they took him, and killed him, and cast him forth out of the vineyard.
9 What therefore will the lord of the vineyard do? he will come and destroy the
husbandmen, and will give the vineyard unto others.
10 Have ye not read even this scripture: The stone which the builders rejected,
The same was made the head of the corner;
11 This was from the Lord, And it is marvellous in our eyes?
12 And they sought to lay hold on him; and they feared the multitude; for they
perceived that he spake the parable against them: and they left him, and went
away.
13 And they send unto him certain of the Pharisees and of the Herodians, that
they might catch him in talk.
14 And when they were come, they say unto him, Teacher, we know that thou art
true, and carest not for any one; for thou regardest not the person of men, but
of a truth teachest the way of God: Is it lawful to give tribute unto Caesar, or
not?
15 Shall we give, or shall we not give? But he, knowing their hypocrisy, said
unto them, Why make ye trial of me? bring me a denarius, that I may see it.
16 And they brought it. And he saith unto them, Whose is this image and
superscription? And they said unto him, Caesar's.
17 And Jesus said unto them, Render unto Caesar the things that are Caesar's,
and unto God the things that are God's. And they marvelled greatly at him.
18 And there come unto him Sadducees, who say that there is no resurrection; and
they asked him, saying,
19 Teacher, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave a wife behind
him, and leave no child, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up
seed unto his brother.
20 There were seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and dying left no seed;
21 and the second took her, and died, leaving no seed behind him; and the third
likewise:
22 and the seven left no seed. Last of all the woman also died.
23 In the resurrection whose wife shall she be of them? for the seven had her to
wife.
24 Jesus said unto them, Is it not for this cause that ye err, that ye know not
the scriptures, nor the power of God?
25 For when they shall rise from the dead, they neither marry, nor are given in
marriage; but are as angels in heaven.
26 But as touching the dead, that they are raised; have ye not read in the book
of Moses, in [the place concerning] the Bush, how God spake unto him, saying, I
[am] the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob?
27 He is not the God of the dead, but of the living: ye do greatly err.
28 And one of the scribes came, and heard them questioning together, and knowing
that he had answered them well, asked him, What commandment is the first of all?
29 Jesus answered, The first is, Hear, O Israel; The Lord our God, the Lord is
one:
30 and thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy
soul, and with all thy mind, and with all thy strength.
31 The second is this, Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. There is none
other commandment greater than these.
32 And the scribe said unto him, Of a truth, Teacher, thou hast well said that
he is one; and there is none other but he:
33 and to love him with all the heart, and with all the understanding, and with
all the strength, and to love his neighbor as himself, is much more than all
whole burnt-offerings and sacrifices.
34 And when Jesus saw that he answered discreetly, he said unto him, Thou art
not far from the kingdom of God. And no man after that durst ask him any
question.
35 And Jesus answered and said, as he taught in the temple, How say the scribes
that the Christ is the son of David?
36 David himself said in the Holy Spirit, The Lord said unto my Lord, Sit thou
on my right hand, Till I make thine enemies the footstool of thy feet.
37 David himself calleth him Lord; and whence is he his son? And the common
people heard him gladly.
38 And in his teaching he said, Beware of the scribes, who desire to walk in
long robes, and [to have] salutations in the marketplaces,
39 and chief seats in the synagogues, and chief places at feasts:
40 they that devour widows' houses, and for a pretence make long prayers; these
shall receive greater condemnation.
41 And he sat down over against the treasury, and beheld how the multitude cast
money into the treasury: and many that were rich cast in much.
42 And there came a poor widow, and she cast in two mites, which make a
farthing.
43 And he called unto him his disciples, and said unto them, Verily I say unto
you, This poor widow cast in more than all they that are casting into the
treasury:
44 for they all did cast in of their superfluity; but she of her want did cast
in all that she had, [even] all her living.

Chapter 13

1 And as he went forth out of the temple, one of his disciples saith unto him,
Teacher, behold, what manner of stones and what manner of buildings!
2 And Jesus said unto him, Seest thou these great buildings? there shall not be
left here one stone upon another, which shall not be thrown down.
3 And as he sat on the mount of Olives over against the temple, Peter and James
and John and Andrew asked him privately,
4 Tell us, when shall these things be? and what [shall be] the sign when these
things are all about to be accomplished?
5 And Jesus began to say unto them, Take heed that no man lead you astray.
6 Many shall come in my name, saying, I am [he] ; and shall lead many astray.
7 And when ye shall hear of wars and rumors of wars, be not troubled: [these
things] must needs come to pass; but the end is not yet.
8 For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom; there shall
be earthquakes in divers places; there shall be famines: these things are the
beginning of travail.
9 But take ye heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to councils; and
in synagogues shall ye be beaten; and before governors and kings shall ye stand
for my sake, for a testimony unto them.
10 And the gospel must first be preached unto all the nations.
11 And when they lead you [to judgment], and deliver you up, be not anxious
beforehand what ye shall speak: but whatsoever shall be given you in that hour,
that speak ye; for it is not ye that speak, but the Holy Spirit.
12 And brother shall deliver up brother to death, and the father his child; and
children shall rise up against parents, and cause them to be put to death.
13 And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that endureth to
the end, the same shall be saved.
14 But when ye see the abomination of desolation standing where he ought not
(let him that readeth understand), then let them that are in Judaea flee unto
the mountains:
15 and let him that is on the housetop not go down, nor enter in, to take
anything out of his house:
16 and let him that is in the field not return back to take his cloak.
17 But woe unto them that are with child and to them that give suck in those
days!
18 And pray ye that it be not in the winter.
19 For those days shall be tribulation, such as there hath not been the like
from the beginning of the creation which God created until now, and never shall
be.
20 And except the Lord had shortened the days, no flesh would have been saved;
but for the elect's sake, whom he chose, he shortened the days.
21 And then if any man shall say unto you, Lo, here is the Christ; or, Lo,
there; believe [it] not:
22 for there shall arise false Christs and false prophets, and shall show signs
and wonders, that they may lead astray, if possible, the elect.
23 But take ye heed: behold, I have told you all things beforehand.
24 But in those days, after that tribulation, the sun shall be darkened, and the
moon shall not give her light,
25 and the stars shall be falling from heaven, and the powers that are in the
heavens shall be shaken.
26 And then shall they see the Son of man coming in clouds with great power and
glory.
27 And then shall he send forth the angels, and shall gather together his elect
from the four winds, from the uttermost part of the earth to the uttermost part
of heaven.
28 Now from the fig tree learn her parable: when her branch is now become
tender, and putteth forth its leaves, ye know that the summer is nigh;
29 even so ye also, when ye see these things coming to pass, know ye that he is
nigh, [even] at the doors.
30 Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, until all these
things be accomplished.
31 Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away.
32 But of that day or that hour knoweth no one, not even the angels in heaven,
neither the Son, but the Father.
33 Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is.
34 [ It is] as [when] a man, sojourning in another country, having left his
house, and given authority to his servants, to each one his work, commanded also
the porter to watch.
35 Watch therefore: for ye know not when the lord of the house cometh, whether
at even, or at midnight, or at cockcrowing, or in the morning;
36 lest coming suddenly he find you sleeping.
37 And what I say unto you I say unto all, Watch.

Chapter 14

1 Now after two days was [the feast of] the passover and the unleavened bread:
and the chief priests and the scribes sought how they might take him with
subtlety, and kill him:
2 for they said, Not during the feast, lest haply there shall be a tumult of the
people.
3 And while he was in Bethany in the house of Simon the leper, as he sat at
meat, there came a woman having an alabaster cruse of ointment of pure nard very
costly; [and] she brake the cruse, and poured it over his head.
4 But there were some that had indignation among themselves, [saying], To what
purpose hath this waste of the ointment been made?
5 For this ointment might have been sold for above three hundred shillings, and
given to the poor. And they murmured against her.
6 But Jesus said, Let her alone; why trouble ye her? she hath wrought a good
work on me.
7 For ye have the poor always with you, and whensoever ye will ye can do them
good: but me ye have not always.
8 She hath done what she could; she hath anointed my body beforehand for the
burying.
9 And verily I say unto you, Wheresoever the gospel shall be preached throughout
the whole world, that also which this woman hath done shall be spoken of for a
memorial of her.
10 And Judas Iscariot, he that was one of the twelve, went away unto the chief
priests, that he might deliver him unto them.
11 And they, when they heard it, were glad, and promised to give him money. And
he sought how he might conveniently deliver him [unto them] .
12 And on the first day of unleavened bread, when they sacrificed the passover,
his disciples say unto him, Where wilt thou that we go and make ready that thou
mayest eat the passover?
13 And he sendeth two of his disciples, and saith unto them, Go into the city,
and there shall meet you a man bearing a pitcher of water: follow him;
14 and wheresoever he shall enter in, say to the master of the house, The
Teacher saith, Where is my guest-chamber, where I shall eat the passover with my
disciples?
15 And he will himself show you a large upper room furnished [and] ready: and
there make ready for us.
16 And the disciples went forth, and came into the city, and found as he had
said unto them: and they made ready the passover.
17 And when it was evening he cometh with the twelve.
18 And as they sat and were eating, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, One of
you shall betray me, [even] he that eateth with me.
19 They began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one, Is it I?
20 And he said unto them, [It is] one of the twelve, he that dippeth with me in
the dish.
21 For the Son of man goeth, even as it is written of him: but woe unto that man
through whom the Son of man is betrayed! good were it for that man if he had not
been born.
22 And as they were eating, he took bread, and when he had blessed, he brake it,
and gave to them, and said, Take ye: this is my body.
23 And he took a cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave to them: and they
all drank of it.
24 And he said unto them, This is my blood of the covenant, which is poured out
for many.
25 Verily I say unto you, I shall no more drink of the fruit of the vine, until
that day when I drink it new in the kingdom of God.
26 And when they had sung a hymn, they went out unto the mount of Olives.
27 And Jesus saith unto them, All ye shall be offended: for it is written, I
will smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered abroad.
28 Howbeit, after I am raised up, I will go before you into Galilee.
29 But Peter said unto him, Although all shall be offended, yet will not I.
30 And Jesus saith unto him, Verily I say unto thee, that thou to-day, [even]
this night, before the cock crow twice, shalt deny me thrice.
31 But he spake exceedingly vehemently, If I must die with thee, I will not deny
thee. And in like manner also said they all.
32 And they come unto a place which was named Gethsemane: and he saith unto his
disciples, Sit ye here, while I pray.
33 And he taketh with him Peter and James and John, and began to be greatly
amazed, and sore troubled.
34 And he saith unto them, My soul is exceeding sorrowful even unto death: abide
ye here, and watch.
35 And he went forward a little, and fell on the ground, and prayed that, if it
were possible, the hour might pass away from him.
36 And he said, Abba, Father, all things are possible unto thee; remove this cup
from me: howbeit not what I will, but what thou wilt.
37 And he cometh, and findeth them sleeping, and saith unto Peter, Simon,
sleepest thou? couldest thou not watch one hour?
38 Watch and pray, that ye enter not into temptation: the spirit indeed is
willing, but the flesh is weak.
39 And again he went away, and prayed, saying the same words.
40 And again he came, and found them sleeping, for their eyes were very heavy;
and they knew not what to answer him.
41 And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take
your rest: it is enough; the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed
into the hands of sinners.
42 Arise, let us be going: behold, he that betrayeth me is at hand.
43 And straightway, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and
with him a multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and the
scribes and the elders.
44 Now he that betrayed him had given them a token, saying, Whomsoever I shall
kiss, that is he; take him, and lead him away safely.
45 And when he was come, straightway he came to him, and saith, Rabbi; and
kissed him.
46 And they laid hands on him, and took him.
47 But a certain one of them that stood by drew his sword, and smote the servant
of the high priest, and struck off his ear.
48 And Jesus answered and said unto them, Are ye come out, as against a robber,
with swords and staves to seize me?
49 I was daily with you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but [this is
done] that the scriptures might be fulfilled.
50 And they all left him, and fled.
51 And a certain young man followed with him, having a linen cloth cast about
him, over [his] naked [body] : and they lay hold on him;
52 but he left the linen cloth, and fled naked.
53 And they led Jesus away to the high priest: and there come together with him
all the chief priests and the elders and the scribes.
54 And Peter had followed him afar off, even within, into the court of the high
priest; and he was sitting with the officers, and warming himself in the light
[of the fire] .
55 Now the chief priests and the whole council sought witness against Jesus to
put him to death; and found it not.
56 For many bare false witness against him, and their witness agreed not
together.
57 And there stood up certain, and bare false witness against him, saying,
58 We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with hands, and in
three days I will build another made without hands.
59 And not even so did their witness agree together.
60 And the high priest stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus, saying, Answerest
thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee?
61 But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him,
and saith unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son of the Blessed?
62 And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the Son of man sitting at the right
hand of Power, and coming with the clouds of heaven.
63 And the high priest rent his clothes, and saith, What further need have we of
witnesses?
64 Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think ye? And they all condemned him to be
worthy of death.
65 And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him, and
to say unto him, Prophesy: and the officers received him with blows of their
hands.
66 And as Peter was beneath in the court, there cometh one of the maids of the
high priest;
67 and seeing Peter warming himself, she looked upon him, and saith, Thou also
wast with the Nazarene, [even] Jesus.
68 But he denied, saying, I neither know, nor understand what thou sayest: and
he went out into the porch; and the cock crew.
69 And the maid saw him, and began again to say to them that stood by, This is
[one] of them.
70 But he again denied it. And after a little while again they that stood by
said to Peter, of a truth thou art [one] of them; for thou art a Galilaean.
71 But he began to curse, and to swear, I know not this man of whom ye speak.
72 And straightway the second time the cock crew. And Peter called to mind the
word, how that Jesus said unto him, Before the cock crow twice, thou shalt deny
me thrice. And when he thought thereon, he wept.

Chapter 15

1 And straightway in the morning the chief priests with the elders and scribes,
and the whole council, held a consultation, and bound Jesus, and carried him
away, and delivered him up to Pilate.
2 And Pilate asked him, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answering saith
unto him, Thou sayest.
3 And the chief priests accused him of many things.
4 And Pilate again asked him, saying, Answerest thou nothing? behold how many
things they accuse thee of.
5 But Jesus no more answered anything; insomuch that Pilate marvelled.
6 Now at the feast he used to release unto them one prisoner, whom they asked of
him.
7 And there was one called Barabbas, [lying] bound with them that had made
insurrection, men who in the insurrection had committed murder.
8 And the multitude went up and began to ask him [to do] as he was wont to do
unto them.
9 And Pilate answered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto you the King of
the Jews?
10 For he perceived that for envy the chief priests had delivered him up.
11 But the chief priests stirred up the multitude, that he should rather release
Barabbas unto them.
12 And Pilate again answered and said unto them, What then shall I do unto him
whom ye call the King of the Jews?
13 And they cried out again, Crucify him.
14 And Pilate said unto them, Why, what evil hath he done? But they cried out
exceedingly, Crucify him.
15 And Pilate, wishing to content the multitude, released unto them Barabbas,
and delivered Jesus, when he had scourged him, to be crucified.
16 And the soldiers led him away within the court, which is the Praetorium; and
they call together the whole band.
17 And they clothe him with purple, and platting a crown of thorns, they put it
on him;
18 and they began to salute him, Hail, King of the Jews!
19 And they smote his head with a reed, and spat upon him, and bowing their
knees worshipped him.
20 And when they had mocked him, they took off from him the purple, and put on
him his garments. And they lead him out to crucify him.
21 And they compel one passing by, Simon of Cyrene, coming from the country, the
father of Alexander and Rufus, to go [with them], that he might bear his cross.
22 And they bring him unto the place Golgotha, which is, being interpreted, The
place of a skull.
23 And they offered him wine mingled with myrrh: but he received it not.
24 And they crucify him, and part his garments among them, casting lots upon
them, what each should take.
25 And it was the third hour, and they crucified him.
26 And the superscription of his accusation was written over, THE KING OF THE
JEWS.
27 And with him they crucify two robbers; one on his right hand, and one on his
left.
28 (Ommitted)
29 And they that passed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and saying, Ha!
Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days,
30 save thyself, and come down from the cross.
31 In like manner also the chief priests mocking [him] among themselves with the
scribes said, He saved others; himself he cannot save.
32 Let the Christ, the King of Israel, now come down from the cross, that we may
see and believe. And they that were crucified with him reproached him.
33 And when the sixth hour was come, there was darkness over the whole land
until the ninth hour.
34 And at the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, Eloi, Eloi, lama
sabachthani? which is, being interpreted, My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken
me?
35 And some of them that stood by, when they heard it, said, Behold, he calleth
Elijah.
36 And one ran, and filling a sponge full of vinegar, put it on a reed, and gave
him to drink, saying, Let be; let us see whether Elijah cometh to take him down.
37 And Jesus uttered a loud voice, and gave up the ghost.
38 And the veil of the temple was rent in two from the top to the bottom.
39 And when the centurion, who stood by over against him, saw that he so gave up
the ghost, he said, Truly this man was the Son of God.
40 And there were also women beholding from afar: among whom [were] both Mary
Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James the less and of Joses, and Salome;
41 who, when he was in Galilee, followed him, and ministered unto him; and many
other women that came up with him unto Jerusalem.
42 And when even was now come, because it was the Preparation, that is, the day
before the sabbath,
43 there came Joseph of Arimathaea, a councillor of honorable estate, who also
himself was looking for the kingdom of God; and he boldly went in unto Pilate,
and asked for the body of Jesus.
44 And Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto him the
centurion, he asked him whether he had been any while dead.
45 And when he learned it of the centurion, he granted the corpse to Joseph.
46 And he bought a linen cloth, and taking him down, wound him in the linen
cloth, and laid him in a tomb which had been hewn out of a rock; and he rolled a
stone against the door of the tomb.
47 And Mary Magdalene and Mary the [mother] of Joses beheld where he was laid.

Chapter 16

1 And when the sabbath was past, Mary Magdalene, and Mary the [mother] of James,
and Salome, bought spices, that they might come and anoint him.
2 And very early on the first day of the week, they come to the tomb when the
sun was risen.
3 And they were saying among themselves, Who shall roll us away the stone from
the door of the tomb?
4 and looking up, they see that the stone is rolled back: for it was exceeding
great.
5 And entering into the tomb, they saw a young man sitting on the right side,
arrayed in a white robe; and they were amazed.
6 And he saith unto them, Be not amazed: ye seek Jesus, the Nazarene, who hath
been crucified: he is risen; he is not here: behold, the place where they laid
him!
7 But go, tell his disciples and Peter, He goeth before you into Galilee: there
shall ye see him, as he said unto you.
8 And they went out, and fled from the tomb; for trembling and astonishment had
come upon them: and they said nothing to any one; for they were afraid.
9 Now when he was risen early on the first day of the week, he appeared first to
Mary Magdalene, from whom he had cast out seven demons.
10 She went and told them that had been with him, as they mourned and wept.
11 And they, when they heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her,
disbelieved.
12 And after these things he was manifested in another form unto two of them, as
they walked, on their way into the country.
13 And they went away and told it unto the rest: neither believed they them.
14 And afterward he was manifested unto the eleven themselves as they sat at
meat; and he upbraided them with their unbelief and hardness of heart, because
they believed not them that had seen him after he was risen.
15 And he said unto them, Go ye into all the world, and preach the gospel to the
whole creation.
16 He that believeth and is baptized shall be saved; but he that disbelieveth
shall be condemned.
17 And these signs shall accompany them that believe: in my name shall they cast
out demons; they shall speak with new tongues;
18 they shall take up serpents, and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall in
no wise hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick, and they shall recover.
19 So then the Lord Jesus, after he had spoken unto them, was received up into
heaven, and sat down at the right hand of God.
20 And they went forth, and preached everywhere, the Lord working with them, and
confirming the word by the signs that followed. Amen.


Luke

Chapter 1

1 Forasmuch as many have taken in hand to draw up a narrative concerning those
matters which have been fulfilled among us,
2 even as they delivered them unto us, who from the beginning were eyewitnesses
and ministers of the word,
3 it seemed good to me also, having traced the course of all things accurately
from the first, to write unto thee in order, most excellent Theophilus;
4 that thou mightest know the certainty concerning the things wherein thou wast
instructed.
5 There was in the days of Herod, king of Judaea, a certain priest named
Zacharias, of the course of Abijah: and he had a wife of the daughters of Aaron,
and her name was Elisabeth.
6 And they were both righteous before God, walking in all the commandments and
ordinances of the Lord blameless.
7 And they had no child, because that Elisabeth was barren, and they both were
[now] well stricken in years.
8 Now it came to pass, while he executed the priest's office before God in the
order of his course,
9 according to the custom of the priest's office, his lot was to enter into the
temple of the Lord and burn incense.
10 And the whole multitude of the people were praying without at the hour of
incense.
11 And there appeared unto him an angel of the Lord standing on the right side
of altar of incense.
12 And Zacharias was troubled when he saw [him], and fear fell upon him.
13 But the angel said unto him, Fear not, Zacharias: because thy supplication is
heard, and thy wife Elisabeth shall bear thee a son, and thou shalt call his
name John.
14 And thou shalt have joy and gladness; and many shall rejoice at his birth.
15 For he shall be great in the sight of the Lord, and he shall drink no wine
nor strong drink; and he shall be filled with the Holy Spirit, even from his
mother's womb.
16 And many of the children of Israel shall be turn unto the Lord their God.
17 And he shall go before his face in the spirit and power of Elijah, to turn
the hearts of the fathers to the children, and the disobedient [to walk] in the
wisdom of the just; to make ready for the Lord a people prepared [for him] .
18 And Zacharias said unto the angel, Whereby shall I know this? for I am an old
man, and my wife well stricken in years.
19 And the angel answering said unto him, I am Gabriel, that stand in the
presence of God; and I was sent to speak unto thee, and to bring thee these good
tidings.
20 And behold, thou shalt be silent and not able to speak, until the day that
these things shall come to pass, because thou believedst not my words, which
shall be fulfilled in their season.
21 And the people were waiting for Zacharias, and they marvelled while he
tarried in the temple.
22 And when he came out, he could not speak unto them: and they perceived that
he had seen a vision in the temple: and he continued making signs unto them, and
remained dumb.
23 And it came to pass, when the days of his ministration were fulfilled, he
departed unto his house.
24 And after these days Elisabeth his wife conceived; and she hid herself five
months, saying,
25 Thus hath the Lord done unto me in the days wherein he looked upon [me], to
take away my reproach among men.
26 Now in the sixth month the angel Gabriel was sent from God unto a city of
Galilee, named Nazareth,
27 to a virgin betrothed to a man whose name was Joseph, of the house of David;
and the virgin's name was Mary.
28 And he came in unto her, and said, Hail, thou that art highly favored, the
Lord [is] with thee.
29 But she was greatly troubled at the saying, and cast in her mind what manner
of salutation this might be.
30 And the angel said unto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found favor with
God.
31 And behold, thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a son, and shalt
call his name JESUS.
32 He shall be great, and shall be called the Son of the Most High: and the Lord
God shall give unto him the throne of his father David:
33 and he shall reign over the house of Jacob for ever; and of his kingdom there
shall be no end.
34 And Mary said unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know not a man?
35 And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy Spirit shall come upon
thee, and the power of the Most High shall overshadow thee: wherefore also the
holy thing which is begotten shall be called the Son of God.
36 And behold, Elisabeth thy kinswoman, she also hath conceived a son in her old
age; and this is the sixth month with her that was called barren.
37 For no word from God shall be void of power.
38 And Mary said, Behold, the handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me according to
thy word. And the angel departed from her.
39 And Mary arose in these days and went into the hill country with haste, into
a city of Judah;
40 and entered into the house of Zacharias and saluted Elisabeth.
41 And it came to pass, when Elisabeth heard the salutation of Mary, the babe
leaped in her womb; and Elisabeth was filled with the Holy Spirit;
42 and she lifted up her voice with a loud cry, and said, Blessed [art] thou
among women, and blessed [is] the fruit of thy womb.
43 And whence is this to me, that the mother of my Lord should come unto me?
44 For behold, when the voice of thy salutation came into mine ears, the babe
leaped in my womb for joy.
45 And blessed [is] she that believed; for there shall be a fulfilment of the
things which have been spoken to her from the Lord.
46 And Mary said, My soul doth magnify the Lord,
47 And my spirit hath rejoiced in God my Saviour.
48 For he hath looked upon the low estate of his handmaid: For behold, from
henceforth all generations shall call me blessed.
49 For he that is mighty hath done to me great things; And holy is his name.
50 And his mercy is unto generations and generations On them that fear him.
51 He hath showed strength with his arm; He hath scattered the proud in the
imagination of their heart.
52 He hath put down princes from [their] thrones, And hath exalted them of low
degree.
53 The hungry he hath filled with good things; And the rich he hath sent empty
away.
54 He hath given help to Israel his servant, That he might remember mercy
55 (As he spake unto our fathers) Toward Abraham and his seed for ever.
56 And Mary abode with her about three months, and returned unto her house.
57 Now Elisabeth's time was fulfilled that she should be delivered; and she
brought forth a son.
58 And her neighbors and her kinsfolk heard that the Lord had magnified his
mercy towards her; and they rejoiced with her.
59 And it came to pass on the eighth day, that they came to circumcise the
child; and they would have called him Zacharias, after the name of the father.
60 And his mother answered and said, Not so; but he shall be called John.
61 And they said unto her, There is none of thy kindred that is called by this
name.
62 And they made signs to his father, what he would have him called.
63 And he asked for a writing tablet, and wrote, saying, His name is John. And
they marvelled all.
64 And his mouth was opened immediately, and his tongue [loosed], and he spake,
blessing God.
65 And fear came on all that dwelt round about them: and all these sayings were
noised abroad throughout all the hill country of Judaea.
66 And all that heard them laid them up in their heart, saying, What then shall
this child be? For the hand of the Lord was with him.
67 And his father Zacharias was filled with the Holy Spirit, and prophesied,
saying,
68 Blessed [be] the Lord, the God of Israel; For he hath visited and wrought
redemption for his people,
69 And hath raised up a horn of salvation for us In the house of his servant
David
70 (As he spake by the mouth of his holy prophets that have been from of old),
71 Salvation from our enemies, and from the hand of all that hate us;
72 To show mercy towards, our fathers, And to remember his holy covenant;
73 The oath which he spake unto Abraham our father,
74 To grant unto us that we being delivered out of the hand of our enemies
Should serve him without fear,
75 In holiness and righteousness before him all our days.
76 Yea and thou, child, shalt be called the prophet of the Most High: For thou
shalt go before the face of the Lord to make ready his ways;
77 To give knowledge of salvation unto his people In the remission of their
sins,
78 Because of the tender mercy of our God, Whereby the dayspring from on high
shall visit us,
79 To shine upon them that sit in darkness and the shadow of death; To guide our
feet into the way of peace.
80 And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, and was in the deserts till
the day of his showing unto Israel.

Chapter 2

1 Now it came to pass in those days, there went out a decree from Caesar
Augustus, that all the world should be enrolled.
2 This was the first enrolment made when Quirinius was governor of Syria.
3 And all went to enrol themselves, every one to his own city.
4 And Joseph also went up from Galilee, out of the city of Nazareth, into
Judaea, to the city of David, which is called Bethlehem, because he was of the
house and family of David;
5 to enrol himself with Mary, who was betrothed to him, being great with child.
6 And it came to pass, while they were there, the days were fulfilled that she
should be delivered.
7 And she brought forth her firstborn son; and she wrapped him in swaddling
clothes, and laid him in a manger, because there was no room for them in the
inn.
8 And there were shepherds in the same country abiding in the field, and keeping
watch by night over their flock.
9 And an angel of the Lord stood by them, and the glory of the Lord shone round
about them: and they were sore afraid.
10 And the angel said unto them, Be not afraid; for behold, I bring you good
tidings of great joy which shall be to all the people:
11 for there is born to you this day in the city of David a Saviour, who is
Christ the Lord.
12 And this [is] the sign unto you: Ye shall find a babe wrapped in swaddling
clothes, and lying in a manger.
13 And suddenly there was with the angel a multitude of the heavenly host
praising God, and saying,
14 Glory to God in the highest, And on earth peace among men in whom he is well
pleased.
15 And it came to pass, when the angels went away from them into heaven, the
shepherds said one to another, Let us now go even unto Bethlehem, and see this
thing that is come to pass, which the Lord hath made known unto us.
16 And they came with haste, and found both Mary and Joseph, and the babe lying
in the manger.
17 And when they saw it, they made known concerning the saying which was spoken
to them about this child.
18 And all that heard it wondered at the things which were spoken unto them by
the shepherds.
19 But Mary kept all these sayings, pondering them in her heart.
20 And the shepherds returned, glorifying and praising God for all the things
that they had heard and seen, even as it was spoken unto them.
21 And when eight days were fulfilled for circumcising him, his name was called
JESUS, which was so called by the angel before he was conceived in the womb.
22 And when the days of their purification according to the law of Moses were
fulfilled, they brought him up to Jerusalem, to present him to the Lord
23 (as it is written in the law of the Lord, Every male that openeth the womb
shall be called holy to the Lord),
24 and to offer a sacrifice according to that which is said in the law of the
Lord, A pair of turtledoves, or two young pigeons.
25 And behold, there was a man in Jerusalem, whose name was Simeon; and this man
was righteous and devout, looking for the consolation of Israel: and the Holy
Spirit was upon him.
26 And it had been revealed unto him by the Holy Spirit, that he should not see
death, before he had seen the Lord's Christ.
27 And he came in the Spirit into the temple: and when the parents brought in
the child Jesus, that they might do concerning him after the custom of the law,
28 then he received him into his arms, and blessed God, and said,
29 Now lettest thou thy servant depart, Lord, According to thy word, in peace;
30 For mine eyes have seen thy salvation,
31 Which thou hast prepared before the face of all peoples;
32 A light for revelation to the Gentiles, And the glory of thy people Israel.
33 And his father and his mother were marvelling at the things which were spoken
concerning him;
34 and Simeon blessed them, and said unto Mary his mother, Behold, this [child]
is set for the falling and the rising of many in Israel; and for a sign which is
spoken against;
35 yea and a sword shall pierce through thine own soul; that thoughts out of
many hearts may be revealed.
36 And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe
of Asher (she was of a great age, having lived with a husband seven years from
her virginity,
37 and she had been a widow even unto fourscore and four years), who departed
not from the temple, worshipping with fastings and supplications night and day.
38 And coming up at that very hour she gave thanks unto God, and spake of him to
all them that were looking for the redemption of Jerusalem.
39 And when they had accomplished all things that were according to the law of
the Lord, they returned into Galilee, to their own city Nazareth.
40 And the child grew, and waxed strong, filled with wisdom: and the grace of
God was upon him.
41 And his parents went every year to Jerusalem at the feast of the passover.
42 And when he was twelve years old, they went up after the custom of the feast;
43 and when they had fulfilled the days, as they were returning, the boy Jesus
tarried behind in Jerusalem; and his parents knew it not;
44 but supposing him to be in the company, they went a day's journey; and they
sought for him among their kinsfolk and acquaintance:
45 and when they found him not, they returned to Jerusalem, seeking for him.
46 And it came to pass, after three days they found him in the temple, sitting
in the midst of the teachers, both hearing them, and asking them questions:
47 and all that heard him were amazed at his understanding and his answers.
48 And when they saw him, they were astonished; and his mother said unto him,
Son, why hast thou thus dealt with us? behold, thy father and I sought thee
sorrowing.
49 And he said unto them, How is it that ye sought me? knew ye not that I must
be in my Father's house?
50 And they understood not the saying which he spake unto them.
51 And he went down with them, and came to Nazareth; and he was subject unto
them: and his mother kept all [these] sayings in her heart.
52 And Jesus advanced in wisdom and stature, and in favor with God and men.

Chapter 3

1 Now in the fifteenth year of the reign of Tiberius Caesar, Pontius Pilate
being governor of Judaea, and Herod being tetrarch of Galilee, and his brother
Philip tetrarch of the region of Ituraea and Trachonitis, and Lysanias tetrarch
of Abilene,
2 in the high-priesthood of Annas and Caiaphas, the word of God came unto John
the son of Zacharias in the wilderness.
3 And he came into all the region round about the Jordan, preaching the baptism
of repentance unto remission of sins;
4 as it is written in the book of the words of Isaiah the prophet, The voice of
one crying in the wilderness, Make ye ready the way of the Lord, Make his paths
straight.
5 Every valley shall be filled, And every mountain and hill shall be brought
low; And the crooked shall become straight, And the rough ways smooth;
6 And all flesh shall see the salvation of God.
7 He said therefore to the multitudes that went out to be baptized of him, Ye
offspring of vipers, who warned you to flee from the wrath to come?
8 Bring forth therefore fruits worthy of repentance, and begin not to say within
yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able
of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham.
9 And even now the axe also lieth at the root of the trees: every tree therefore
that bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire.
10 And the multitudes asked him, saying, What then must we do?
11 And he answered and said unto them, He that hath two coats, let him impart to
him that hath none; and he that hath food, let him do likewise.
12 And there came also publicans to be baptized, and they said unto him,
Teacher, what must we do?
13 And he said unto them, Extort no more than that which is appointed you.
14 And soldiers also asked him, saying, And we, what must we do? And he said
unto them, Extort from no man by violence, neither accuse [any one] wrongfully;
and be content with your wages. [
15 And as the people were in expectation, and all men reasoned in their hearts
concerning John, whether haply he were the Christ;
16 John answered, saying unto them all, I indeed baptize you with water; but
there cometh he that is mightier than I, the latchet of whose shoes I am not
worthy to unloose: he shall baptize you [ in the Holy Spirit and [in] fire:
17 whose fan is in his hand, thoroughly to cleanse his threshing-floor, and to
gather the wheat into his garner; but the chaff he will burn up with
unquenchable fire.
18 With many other exhortations therefore preached he good tidings unto the
people;
19 but Herod the tetrarch, being reproved by him for Herodias his brother's
wife, and for all the evil things which Herod had done,
20 added this also to them all, that he shut up John in prison.
21 Now it came to pass, when all the people were baptized, that, Jesus also
having been baptized, and praying, the heaven was opened,
22 and the Holy Spirit descended in a bodily form, as a dove, upon him, and a
voice came out of heaven, Thou art my beloved Son; in thee I am well pleased.
23 And Jesus himself, when he began [to teach], was about thirty years of age,
being the son (as was supposed) of Joseph, the [son] of Heli,
24 the [son] of Matthat, the [son] of Levi, the [son] of Melchi, the [son] of
Jannai, the [son] of Joseph,
25 the [son] of Mattathias, the [son] of Amos, the [son] of Nahum, the [son] of
Esli, the [son] of Naggai,
26 the [son] of Maath, the [son] of Mattathias, the [son] of Semein, the [son]
of Josech, the [son] of Joda,
27 the [son] of Joanan, the [son] of Rhesa, the [son] of Zerubbabel, the [son]
of Shealtiel, the [son] of Neri,
28 the [son] of Melchi, the [son] of Addi, the [son] of Cosam, the [son] of
Elmadam, the [son] of Er,
29 the [son] of Jesus, the [son] of Eliezer, the son of Jorim, the [son] of
Matthat, the [son] of Levi,
30 the [son] of Symeon, the [son] of Judas, the [son] of Joseph, the [son] of
Jonam, the [son] of Eliakim,
31 the [son] of Melea, the [son] of Menna, the [son] of Mattatha, the [son] of
Nathan, the [son] of David,
32 the [son] of Jesse, the [son] of Obed, the [son] of Boaz, the [son] of
Salmon, the [son] of Nahshon,
33 the [son] of Amminadab, the [son] of Arni, the [son] of Hezron, the [son] of
Perez, the [son] of Judah,
34 the [son] of Jacob, the [son] of Isaac, the [son] of Abraham, the [son] of
Terah, the [son] of Nahor,
35 the [son] of Serug, the [son] of Reu, the [son] of Peleg, the [son] of Eber,
the [son] of Shelah,
36 the [son] of Cainan, the [son] of Arphaxad, the [son] of Shem, the [son] of
Noah, the [son] of Lamech,
37 the [son] of Methuselah, the [son] of Enoch, the [son] of Jared, the [son] of
Mahalaleel, the [son] of Cainan,
38 the [son] of Enos, the [son] of Seth, the [son] of Adam, the [son] of God.

Chapter 4

1 And Jesus, full of the Holy Spirit, returned from the Jordan, and was led in
the Spirit in the wilderness
2 during forty days, being tempted of the devil. And he did eat nothing in those
days: and when they were completed, he hungered.
3 And the devil said unto him, if thou art the Son of God, command this stone
that it become bread.
4 And Jesus answered unto him, It is written, Man shall not live by bread alone.
5 And he led him up, and showed him all the kingdoms of the world in a moment of
time.
6 And the devil said unto him, To thee will I give all this authority, and the
glory of them: for it hath been delivered unto me; and to whomsoever I will I
give it.
7 If thou therefore wilt worship before me, it shall all be thine.
8 And Jesus answered and said unto him, It is written, Thou shalt worship the
Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve.
9 And he led him to Jerusalem, and set him on the pinnacle of the temple, and
said unto him, If thou art the Son of God, cast thyself down from hence:
10 for it is written, He shall give his angels charge concerning thee, to guard
thee:
11 and, On their hands they shall bear thee up, Lest haply thou dash thy foot
against a stone.
12 And Jesus answering said unto him, It is said, Thou shalt not make trial of
the Lord thy God.
13 And when the devil had completed every temptation, he departed from him for a
season.
14 And Jesus returned in the power of the Spirit into Galilee: and a fame went
out concerning him through all the region round about.
15 And he taught in their synagogues, being glorified of all.
16 And he came to Nazareth, where he had been brought up: and he entered, as his
custom was, into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and stood up to read.
17 And there was delivered unto him the book of the prophet Isaiah. And he
opened the book, and found the place where it was written,
18 The Spirit of the Lord is upon me, Because he anointed me to preach good
tidings to the poor: He hath sent me to proclaim release to the captives, And
recovering of sight to the blind, To set at liberty them that are bruised,
19 To proclaim the acceptable year of the Lord.
20 And he closed the book, and gave it back to the attendant, and sat down: and
the eyes of all in the synagogue were fastened on him.
21 And he began to say unto them, To-day hath this scripture been fulfilled in
your ears.
22 And all bare him witness, and wondered at the words of grace which proceeded
out of his mouth: and they said, Is not this Joseph's son?
23 And he said unto them, Doubtless ye will say unto me this parable, Physician,
heal thyself: whatsoever we have heard done at Capernaum, do also here in thine
own country.
24 And he said, Verily I say unto you, No prophet is acceptable in his own
country.
25 But of a truth I say unto you, There were many widows in Israel in the days
of Elijah, when the heaven was shut up three years and six months, when there
came a great famine over all the land;
26 and unto none of them was Elijah sent, but only to Zarephath, in the land of
Sidon, unto a woman that was a widow.
27 And there were many lepers in Israel in the time of Elisha the prophet; and
none of them was cleansed, but only Naaman the Syrian.
28 And they were all filled with wrath in the synagogue, as they heard these
things;
29 and they rose up, and cast him forth out of the city, and led him unto the
brow of the hill whereon their city was built, that they might throw him down
headlong.
30 But he passing through the midst of them went his way.
31 And he came down to Capernaum, a city of Galilee. And he was teaching them on
the sabbath day:
32 and they were astonished at his teaching; for his word was with authority.
33 And in the synagogue there was a man, that had a spirit of an unclean demon;
and he cried out with a loud voice,
34 Ah! what have we to do with thee, Jesus thou Nazarene? art thou come to
destroy us? I know thee who thou art, the Holy One of God.
35 And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him. And when
the demon had thrown him down in the midst, he came out of him, having done him
no hurt.
36 And amazement came upon all, and they spake together, one with another,
saying, What is this word? for with authority and power he commandeth the
unclean spirits, and they come out.
37 And there went forth a rumor concerning him into every place of the region
round about.
38 And he rose up from the synagogue, and entered into the house of Simon. And
Simon's wife's mother was holden with a great fever; and they besought him for
her.
39 And he stood over her, and rebuked the fever; and it left her: and
immediately she rose up and ministered unto them.
40 And when the sun was setting, all they that had any sick with divers diseases
brought them unto him; and he laid his hands on every one of them, and healed
them.
41 And demons also came out from many, crying out, and saying, Thou art the Son
of God. And rebuking them, he suffered them not to speak, because they knew that
he was the Christ.
42 And when it was day, he came out and went into a desert place: and the
multitudes sought after him, and came unto him, and would have stayed him, that
he should not go from them.
43 But he said unto them, I must preach the good tidings of the kingdom of God
to the other cities also: for therefore was I sent.
44 And he was preaching in the synagogues of Galilee.

Chapter 5

1 Now it came to pass, while the multitude pressed upon him and heard the word
of God, that he was standing by the lake of Gennesaret;
2 and he saw two boats standing by the lake: but the fishermen had gone out of
them, and were washing their nets.
3 And he entered into one of the boats, which was Simon's, and asked him to put
out a little from the land. And he sat down and taught the multitudes out of the
boat.
4 And when he had left speaking, he said unto Simon, Put out into the deep, and
let down your nets for a draught.
5 And Simon answered and said, Master, we toiled all night, and took nothing:
but at thy word I will let down the nets.
6 And when they had done this, they inclosed a great multitude of fishes; and
their nets were breaking;
7 and they beckoned unto their partners in the other boat, that they should come
and help them. And they came, and filled both the boats, so that they began to
sink.
8 But Simon Peter, when he saw it, fell down at Jesus' knees, saying, Depart
from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord.
9 For he was amazed, and all that were with him, at the draught of the fishes
which they had taken;
10 and so were also James and John, sons of Zebedee, who were partners with
Simon. And Jesus said unto Simon, Fear not; from henceforth thou shalt catch
men.
11 And when they had brought their boats to land, they left all, and followed
him.
12 And it came to pass, while he was in one of the cities, behold, a man full of
leprosy: and when he saw Jesus, he fell on his face, and besought him, saying,
Lord, if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean.
13 And he stretched forth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will; be thou
made clean. And straightway the leprosy departed from him.
14 And he charged him to tell no man: but go thy way, and show thyself to the
priest, and offer for thy cleansing, according as Moses commanded, for a
testimony unto them.
15 But so much the more went abroad the report concerning him: and great
multitudes came together to hear, and to be healed of their infirmities.
16 But he withdrew himself in the deserts, and prayed.
17 And it came to pass on one of those days, that he was teaching; and there
were Pharisees and doctors of the law sitting by, who were come out of every
village of Galilee and Judaea and Jerusalem: and the power of the Lord was with
him to heal.
18 And behold, men bring on a bed a man that was palsied: and they sought to
bring him in, and to lay him before him.
19 And not finding by what [way] they might bring him in because of the
multitude, they went up to the housetop, and let him down through the tiles with
his couch into the midst before Jesus.
20 And seeing their faith, he said, Man, thy sins are forgiven thee.
21 And the scribes and the Pharisees began to reason, saying, Who is this that
speaketh blasphemies? Who can forgive sins, but God alone?
22 But Jesus perceiving their reasonings, answered and said unto them, Why
reason ye in your hearts?
23 Which is easier, to say, Thy sins are forgiven thee; or to say, Arise and
walk?
24 But that ye may know that the Son of man hath authority on earth to forgive
sins (he said unto him that was palsied), I say unto thee, Arise, and take up
thy couch, and go unto thy house.
25 And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay, and
departed to his house, glorifying God.
26 And amazement took hold on all, and they glorified God; and they were filled
with fear, saying, We have seen strange things to-day.
27 And after these things he went forth, and beheld a publican, named Levi,
sitting at the place of toll, and said unto him, Follow me.
28 And he forsook all, and rose up and followed him.
29 And Levi made him a great feast in his house: and there was a great multitude
of publicans and of others that were sitting at meat with them.
30 And the Pharisees and their scribes murmured against his disciples, saying,
Why do ye eat and drink with the publicans and sinners?
31 And Jesus answering said unto them, They that are in health have no need of a
physician; but they that are sick.
32 I am not come to call the righteous but sinners to repentance.
33 And they said unto him, The disciples of John fast often, and make
supplications; likewise also the [disciples] of the Pharisees; but thine eat and
drink.
34 And Jesus said unto them, Can ye make the sons of the bride-chamber fast,
while the bridegroom is with them?
35 But the days will come; and when the bridegroom shall be taken away from
them, then will they fast in those days.
36 And he spake also a parable unto them: No man rendeth a piece from a new
garment and putteth it upon an old garment; else he will rend the new, and also
the piece from the new will not agree with the old.
37 And no man putteth new wine into old wine-skins; else the new wine will burst
the skins, and itself will be spilled, and the skins will perish.
38 But new wine must be put into fresh wine-skins.
39 And no man having drunk old [wine] desireth new; for he saith, The old is
good.

Chapter 6

1 Now it came to pass on a sabbath, that he was going through the grainfields;
and his disciples plucked the ears, and did eat, rubbing them in their hands.
2 But certain of the Pharisees said, Why do ye that which it is not lawful to do
on the sabbath day?
3 And Jesus answering them said, Have ye not read even this, what David did,
when he was hungry, he, and they that were with him;
4 how he entered into the house of God, and took and ate the showbread, and gave
also to them that were with him; which it is not lawful to eat save for the
priests alone?
5 And he said unto them, The Son of man is lord of the sabbath.
6 And it came to pass on another sabbath, that he entered into the synagogue and
taught: and there was a man there, and his right hand was withered.
7 And the scribes and the Pharisees watched him, whether he would heal on the
sabbath; that they might find how to accuse him.
8 But he knew their thoughts; and he said to the man that had his hand withered,
Rise up, and stand forth in the midst. And he arose and stood forth.
9 And Jesus said unto them, I ask you, Is it lawful on the sabbath to do good,
or to do harm? to save a life, or to destroy it?
10 And he looked round about on them all, and said unto him, Stretch forth thy
hand. And he did [so] : and his hand was restored.
11 But they were filled with madness; and communed one with another what they
might do to Jesus.
12 And it came to pass in these days, that he went out into the mountain to
pray; and he continued all night in prayer to God.
13 And when it was day, he called his disciples; and he chose from them twelve,
whom also he named apostles:
14 Simon, whom he also named Peter, and Andrew his brother, and James and John,
and Philip and Bartholomew,
15 and Matthew and Thomas, and James [the son] of Alphaeus, and Simon who was
called the Zealot,
16 and Judas [the son] of James, and Judas Iscariot, who became a traitor;
17 and he came down with them, and stood on a level place, and a great multitude
of his disciples, and a great number of the people from all Judaea and
Jerusalem, and the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, who came to hear him, and to be
healed of their diseases;
18 and they that were troubled with unclean spirits were healed.
19 And all the multitude sought to touch him; for power came forth from him, and
healed [them] all.
20 And he lifted up his eyes on his disciples, and said, Blessed [are] ye poor:
for yours is the kingdom of God.
21 Blessed [are] ye that hunger now: for ye shall be filled. Blessed [are] ye
that weep now: for ye shall laugh.
22 Blessed are ye, when men shall hate you, and when they shall separate you
[from their company], and reproach you, and cast out your name as evil, for the
Son of man's sake.
23 Rejoice in that day, and leap [for joy] : for behold, your reward is great in
heaven; for in the same manner did their fathers unto the prophets.
24 But woe unto you that are rich! for ye have received your consolation.
25 Woe unto you, ye that are full now! for ye shall hunger. Woe [unto you], ye
that laugh now! for ye shall mourn and weep.
26 Woe [unto you], when all men shall speak well of you! for in the same manner
did their fathers to the false prophets.
27 But I say unto you that hear, Love your enemies, do good to them that hate
you,
28 bless them that curse you, pray for them that despitefully use you.
29 To him that smiteth thee on the [one] cheek offer also the other; and from
him that taketh away thy cloak withhold not thy coat also.
30 Give to every one that asketh thee; and of him that taketh away thy goods ask
them not again.
31 And as ye would that men should do to you, do ye also to them likewise.
32 And if ye love them that love you, what thank have ye? for even sinners love
those that love them.
33 And if ye do good to them that do good to you, what thank have ye? for even
sinners do the same.
34 And if ye lend to them of whom ye hope to receive, what thank have ye? even
sinners lend to sinners, to receive again as much.
35 But love your enemies, and do [them] good, and lend, never despairing; and
your reward shall be great, and ye shall be sons of the Most High: for he is
kind toward the unthankful and evil.
36 Be ye merciful, even as your Father is merciful.
37 And judge not, and ye shall not be judged: and condemn not, and ye shall not
be condemned: release, and ye shall be released:
38 give, and it shall be given unto you; good measure, pressed down, shaken
together, running over, shall they give into your bosom. For with what measure
ye mete it shall be measured to you again.
39 And he spake also a parable unto them, Can the blind guide the blind? shall
they not both fall into a pit?
40 The disciple is not above his teacher: but every one when he is perfected
shall be as his teacher.
41 And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but considerest
not the beam that is in thine own eye?
42 Or how canst thou say to thy brother, Brother, let me cast out the mote that
is in thine eye, when thou thyself beholdest not the beam that is in thine own
eye? Thou hypocrite, cast out first the beam out of thine own eye, and then
shalt thou see clearly to cast out the mote that is in thy brother's eye.
43 For there is no good tree that bringeth forth corrupt fruit; nor again a
corrupt tree that bringeth forth good fruit.
44 For each tree is known by its own fruit. For of thorns men do not gather
figs, nor of a bramble bush gather they grapes.
45 The good man out of the good treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which
is good; and the evil [man] out of the evil [treasure] bringeth forth that which
is evil: for out of the abundance of the heart his mouth speaketh.
46 And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I say?
47 Every one that cometh unto me, and heareth my words, and doeth them, I will
show you to whom he is like:
48 he is like a man building a house, who digged and went deep, and laid a
foundation upon the rock: and when a flood arose, the stream brake against that
house, and could not shake it: because it had been well builded.
49 But he that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that built a house upon the
earth without a foundation; against which the stream brake, and straightway it
fell in; and the ruin of that house was great.

Chapter 7

1 After he had ended all his sayings in the ears of the people, he entered into
Capernaum.
2 And a certain centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was sick and at the
point of death.
3 And when he heard concerning Jesus, he sent unto him elders of the Jews,
asking him that he would come and save his servant.
4 And they, when they came to Jesus, besought him earnestly, saying, He is
worthy that thou shouldest do this for him;
5 for he loveth our nation, and himself built us our synagogue.
6 And Jesus went with them. And when he was now not far from the house, the
centurion sent friends to him, saying unto him, Lord, trouble not thyself; for I
am not worthy that thou shouldest come under my roof:
7 wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee: but say the word,
and my servant shall be healed.
8 For I also am a man set under authority, having under myself soldiers: and I
say to this one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to
my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. [
9 And when Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned and said
unto the multitude that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great
faith, no, not in Israel.
10 And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole.
11 And it came to pass soon afterwards, that he went to a city called Nain; and
his disciples went with him, and a great multitude.
12 Now when he drew near to the gate of the city, behold, there was carried out
one that was dead, the only son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much
people of the city was with her.
13 And when the Lord saw her, he had compassion on her, and said unto her, Weep
not.
14 And he came nigh and touched the bier: and the bearers stood still. And he
said, Young man, I say unto thee, Arise.
15 And he that was dead sat up, and began to speak. And he gave him to his
mother.
16 And fear took hold on all: and they glorified God, saying, A great prophet is
arisen among us: and, God hath visited his people.
17 And this report went forth concerning him in the whole of Judaea, and all the
region round about.
18 And the disciples of John told him of all these things.
19 And John calling unto him two of his disciples sent them to the Lord, saying,
Art thou he that cometh, or look we for another?
20 And when the men were come unto him, they said, John the Baptist hath sent us
unto thee, saying, Art thou he that cometh, or look we for another?
21 In that hour he cured many of diseases and plagues and evil spirits; and on
many that were blind he bestowed sight.
22 And he answered and said unto them, Go and tell John the things which ye have
seen and heard; the blind receive their sight, the lame walk, the lepers are
cleansed, and the deaf hear, the dead are raised up, the poor have good tidings
preached to them.
23 And blessed is he, whosoever shall find no occasion of stumbling in me.
24 And when the messengers of John were departed, he began to say unto the
multitudes concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness to behold? a
reed shaken with the wind?
25 But what went ye out to see? a man clothed in soft raiment? Behold, they that
are gorgeously apparelled, and live delicately, are in kings' courts.
26 But what went ye out to see? a prophet? Yea, I say unto you, and much more
than a prophet.
27 This is he of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy
face, Who shall prepare thy way before thee.
28 I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there is none greater than
John: yet he that is but little in the kingdom of God is greater than he.
29 And all the people when they heard, and the publicans, justified God, being
baptized with the baptism of John.
30 But the Pharisees and the lawyers rejected for themselves the counsel of God,
being not baptized of him.
31 Whereunto then shall I liken the men of this generation, and to what are they
like?
32 They are like unto children that sit in the marketplace, and call one to
another; who say, We piped unto you, and ye did not dance; we wailed, and ye did
not weep.
33 For John the Baptist is come eating no bread nor drinking wine; and ye say,
He hath a demon.
34 The Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold, a gluttonous
man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners!
35 And wisdom is justified of all her children.
36 And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat with him. And he
entered into the Pharisee's house, and sat down to meat.
37 And behold, a woman who was in the city, a sinner; and when she knew that he
was sitting at meat in the Pharisee's house, she brought an alabaster cruse of
ointment, [
38 and standing behind at his feet, weeping, she began to wet his feet with her
tears, and wiped them with the hair of her head, and kissed his feet, and
anointed them with the ointment.
39 Now when the Pharisee that had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself,
saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have perceived who and what manner
of woman this is that toucheth him, that she is a sinner.
40 And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee.
And he saith, Teacher, say on.
41 A certain lender had two debtors: the one owed five hundred shillings, and
the other fifty.
42 When they had not [wherewith] to pay, he forgave them both. Which of them
therefore will love him most?
43 Simon answered and said, He, I suppose, to whom he forgave the most. And he
said unto him, Thou hast rightly judged.
44 And turning to the woman, he said unto Simon, Seest thou this woman? I
entered into thy house, thou gavest me no water for my feet: but she hath wetted
my feet with her tears, and wiped them with her hair.
45 Thou gavest me no kiss: but she, since the time I came in, hath not ceased to
kiss my feet.
46 My head with oil thou didst not anoint: but she hath anointed my feet with
ointment.
47 Wherefore I say unto thee, Her sins, which are many, are forgiven; for she
loved much: but to whom little is forgiven, [the same] loveth little.
48 And he said unto her, Thy sins are forgiven.
49 And they that sat at meat with him began to say within themselves, Who is
this that even forgiveth sins?
50 And he said unto the woman, Thy faith hath saved thee; go in peace.

Chapter 8

1 And it came to pass soon afterwards, that he went about through cities and
villages, preaching and bringing the good tidings of the kingdom of God, and
with him the twelve,
2 and certain women who had been healed of evil spirits and infirmities: Mary
that was called Magdalene, from whom seven demons had gone out,
3 and Joanna the wife of Chuzas Herod's steward, and Susanna, and many others,
who ministered unto them of their substance.
4 And when a great multitude came together, and they of every city resorted unto
him, he spake by a parable:
5 The sower went forth to sow his seed: and as he sowed, some fell by the way
side; and it was trodden under foot, and the birds of the heaven devoured it.
6 And other fell on the rock; and as soon as it grew, it withered away, because
it had no moisture.
7 And other fell amidst the thorns; and the thorns grew with it, and choked it.
8 And other fell into the good ground, and grew, and brought forth fruit a
hundredfold. As he said these things, he cried, He that hath ears to hear, let
him hear.
9 And his disciples asked him what this parable might be.
10 And he said, Unto you it is given to know the mysteries of the kingdom of
God: but to the rest in parables; that seeing they may not see, and hearing they
may not understand.
11 Now the parable is this: The seed is the word of God.
12 And those by the way side are they that have heard; then cometh the devil,
and taketh away the word from their heart, that they may not believe and be
saved.
13 And those on the rock [are] they who, when they have heard, receive the word
with joy; and these have no root, who for a while believe, and in time of
temptation fall away.
14 And that which fell among the thorns, these are they that have heard, and as
they go on their way they are choked with cares and riches and pleasures of
[this] life, and bring no fruit to perfection.
15 And that in the good ground, these are such as in an honest and good heart,
having heard the word, hold it fast, and bring forth fruit with patience.
16 And no man, when he hath lighted a lamp, covereth it with a vessel, or
putteth it under a bed; but putteth it on a stand, that they that enter in may
see the light.
17 For nothing is hid, that shall not be made manifest; nor [anything] secret,
that shall not be known and come to light.
18 Take heed therefore how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall be given;
and whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken away even that which he thinketh
he hath.
19 And there came to him his mother and brethren, and they could not come at him
for the crowd.
20 And it was told him, Thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to
see thee.
21 But he answered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these that
hear the word of God, and do it.
22 Now it came to pass on one of those days, that he entered into a boat,
himself and his disciples; and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other
side of the lake: and they launched forth.
23 But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the
lake; and they were filling [with water], and were in jeopardy.
24 And they came to him, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we perish. And
he awoke, and rebuked the wind and the raging of the water: and they ceased, and
there was a calm.
25 And he said unto them, Where is your faith? And being afraid they marvelled,
saying one to another, Who then is this, that he commandeth even the winds and
the water, and they obey him?
26 And they arrived at the country of the Gerasenes, which is over against
Galilee.
27 And when he was come forth upon the land, there met him a certain man out of
the city, who had demons; and for a long time he had worn no clothes, and abode
not in [any] house, but in the tombs.
28 And when he saw Jesus, he cried out, and fell down before him, and with a
loud voice said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of the Most High
God? I beseech thee, torment me not.
29 For he was commanding the unclean spirit to come out from the man. For
oftentimes it had seized him: and he was kept under guard, and bound with chains
and fetters; and breaking the bands asunder, he was driven of the demon into the
deserts.
30 And Jesus asked him, What is thy name? And he said, Legion; for many demons
were entered into him.
31 And they entreated him that he would not command them to depart into the
abyss.
32 Now there was there a herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they
entreated him that he would give them leave to enter into them. And he gave them
leave.
33 And the demons came out from the man, and entered into the swine: and the
herd rushed down the steep into the lake, and were drowned.
34 And when they that fed them saw what had come to pass, they fled, and told it
in the city and in the country.
35 And they went out to see what had come to pass; and they came to Jesus, and
found the man, from whom the demons were gone out, sitting, clothed and in his
right mind, at the feet of Jesus: and they were afraid.
36 And they that saw it told them how he that was possessed with demons was made
whole.
37 And all the people of the country of the Gerasenes round about asked him to
depart from them, for they were holden with great fear: and he entered into a
boat, and returned.
38 But the man from whom the demons were gone out prayed him that he might be
with him: but he sent him away, saying,
39 Return to thy house, and declare how great things God hath done for thee. And
he went his way, publishing throughout the whole city how great things Jesus had
done for him.
40 And as Jesus returned, the multitude welcomed him; for they were all waiting
for him.
41 And behold, there came a man named Jairus, and he was a ruler of the
synagogue: and he fell down at Jesus' feet, and besought him to come into his
house;
42 for he had an only daughter, about twelve years of age, and she was dying.
But as he went the multitudes thronged him.
43 And a woman having an issue of blood twelve years, who had spent all her
living upon physicians, and could not be healed of any,
44 came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and immediately the
issue of her blood stanched.
45 And Jesus said, Who is it that touched me? And when all denied, Peter said,
and they that were with him, Master, the multitudes press thee and crush [thee]
.
46 But Jesus said, Some one did touch me; for I perceived that power had gone
forth from me.
47 And when the woman saw that she was not hid, she came trembling, and falling
down before him declared in the presence of all the people for what cause she
touched him, and how she was healed immediately.
48 And he said unto her, Daughter, thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace.
49 While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler of the synagogue's
[house], saying, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not the Teacher.
50 But Jesus hearing it, answered him, Fear not: only believe, and she shall be
made whole.
51 And when he came to the house, he suffered not any man to enter in with him,
save Peter, and John, and James, and the father of the maiden and her mother.
52 And all were weeping, and bewailing her: but he said, Weep not; for she is
not dead, but sleepeth.
53 And they laughed him to scorn, knowing that she was dead.
54 But he, taking her by the hand, called, saying, Maiden, arise.
55 And her spirit returned, and she rose up immediately: and he commanded that
[something] be given her to eat.
56 And her parents were amazed: but he charged them to tell no man what had been
done.

Chapter 9

1 And he called the twelve together, and gave them power and authority over all
demons, and to cure diseases.
2 And he sent them forth to preach the kingdom of God, and to heal the sick.
3 And he said unto them, Take nothing for your journey, neither staff, nor
wallet, nor bread, nor money; neither have two coats.
4 And into whatsoever house ye enter, there abide, and thence depart.
5 And as many as receive you not, when ye depart from that city, shake off the
dust from your feet for a testimony against them.
6 And they departed, and went throughout the villages, preaching the gospel, and
healing everywhere.
7 Now Herod the tetrarch heard of all that was done: and he was much perplexed,
because that it was said by some, that John was risen from the dead;
8 and by some, that Elijah had appeared; and by others, that one of the old
prophets was risen again.
9 And Herod said, John I beheaded: but who is this, about whom I hear such
things? And he sought to see him.
10 And the apostles, when they were returned, declared unto him what things they
had done. And he took them, and withdrew apart to a city called Bethsaida.
11 But the multitudes perceiving it followed him: and he welcomed them, and
spake to them of the kingdom of God, and them that had need of healing he cured.
12 And the day began to wear away; and the twelve came, and said unto him, Send
the multitude away, that they may go into the villages and country round about,
and lodge, and get provisions: for we are here in a desert place.
13 But he said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they said, We have no more
than five loaves and two fishes; except we should go and buy food for all this
people.
14 For they were about five thousand men. And he said unto his disciples, Make
them sit down in companies, about fifty each.
15 And they did so, and made them all sit down.
16 And he took the five loaves and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he
blessed them, and brake; and gave to the disciples to set before the multitude.
17 And they ate, and were all filled: and there was taken up that which remained
over to them of broken pieces, twelve baskets.
18 And it came to pass, as he was praying apart, the disciples were with him:
and he asked them, saying, Who do the multitudes say that I am?
19 And they answering said, John the Baptist; but others [say], Elijah; and
others, that one of the old prophets is risen again.
20 And he said unto them, But who say ye that I am? And Peter answering said,
The Christ of God.
21 But he charged them, and commanded [them] to tell this to no man;
22 saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders
and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and the third day be raised up.
23 And he said unto all, If any man would come after me, let him deny himself,
and take up his cross daily, and follow me.
24 For whosoever would save his life shall lose it; but whosoever shall lose his
life for my sake, the same shall save it.
25 For what is a man profited, if he gain the whole world, and lose or forfeit
his own self?
26 For whosoever shall be ashamed of me and of my words, of him shall the Son of
man be ashamed, when he cometh in his own glory, and [the glory] of the Father,
and of the holy angels.
27 But I tell you of a truth, There are some of them that stand here, who shall
in no wise taste of death, till they see the kingdom of God.
28 And it came to pass about eight days after these sayings, that he took with
him Peter and John and James, and went up into the mountain to pray.
29 And as he was praying, the fashion of his countenance was altered, and his
raiment [became] white [and] dazzling.
30 And behold, there talked with him two men, who were Moses and Elijah;
31 who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he was about to
accomplish at Jerusalem.
32 Now Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: but when they
were fully awake, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood with him.
33 And it came to pass, as they were parting from him, Peter said unto Jesus,
Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for
thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elijah: not knowing what he said.
34 And while he said these things, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them:
and they feared as they entered into the cloud.
35 And a voice came out of the cloud, saying, This is my Son, my chosen: hear ye
him.
36 And when the voice came, Jesus was found alone. And they held their peace,
and told no man in those days any of the things which they had seen.
37 And it came to pass, on the next day, when they were come down from the
mountain, a great multitude met him.
38 And behold, a man from the multitude cried, saying, Teacher, I beseech thee
to look upon my son; for he is mine only child:
39 and behold, a spirit taketh him, and he suddenly crieth out; and it teareth
him that he foameth, and it hardly departeth from him, bruising him sorely.
40 And I besought thy disciples to cast it out; and they could not.
41 And Jesus answered and said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long
shall I be with you, and bear with you? bring hither thy son.
42 And as he was yet a coming, the demon dashed him down, and tare [him]
grievously. But Jesus rebuked the unclean spirit, and healed the boy, and gave
him back to his father.
43 And they were all astonished at the majesty of God. But while all were
marvelling at all the things which he did, he said unto his disciples,
44 Let these words sink into your ears: for the Son of man shall be delivered up
into the hands of men.
45 But they understood not this saying, and it was concealed from them, that
they should not perceive it; and they were afraid to ask him about this saying.
46 And there arose a reasoning among them, which of them was the greatest.
47 But when Jesus saw the reasoning of their heart, he took a little child, and
set him by his side,
48 and said unto them, Whosoever shall receive this little child in my name
receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me receiveth him that sent me: for he
that is least among you all, the same is great.
49 And John answered and said, Master, we saw one casting out demons in thy
name; and we forbade him, because he followeth not with us.
50 But Jesus said unto him, Forbid [him] not: for he that is not against you is
for you.
51 And it came to pass, when the days were well-nigh come that he should be
received up, he stedfastly set his face to go to Jerusalem,
52 and sent messengers before his face: and they went, and entered into a
village of the Samaritans, to make ready for him.
53 And they did not receive him, because his face was [as though he were] going
to Jerusalem.
54 And when his disciples James and John saw [this], they said, Lord, wilt thou
that we bid fire to come down from heaven, and consume them ?
55 But he turned, and rebuked them.
56 And they went to another village.
57 And as they went on the way, a certain man said unto him, I will follow thee
whithersoever thou goest.
58 And Jesus said unto him, The foxes have holes, and the birds of the heaven
[have] nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head.
59 And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go
and bury my father.
60 But he said unto him, Leave the dead to bury their own dead; but go thou and
publish abroad the kingdom of God.
61 And another also said, I will follow thee, Lord; but first suffer me to bid
farewell to them that are at my house.
62 But Jesus said unto him, No man, having put his hand to the plow, and looking
back, is fit for the kingdom of God.

Chapter 10

1 Now after these things the Lord appointed seventy others, and sent them two
and two before his face into every city and place, whither he himself was about
to come.
2 And he said unto them, The harvest indeed is plenteous, but the laborers are
few: pray ye therefore the Lord of the harvest, that he send forth laborers into
his harvest.
3 Go your ways; behold, I send you forth as lambs in the midst of wolves.
4 Carry no purse, no wallet, no shoes; and salute no man on the way.
5 And into whatsoever house ye shall enter, first say, Peace [be] to this house.
6 And if a son of peace be there, your peace shall rest upon him: but if not, it
shall turn to you again.
7 And in that same house remain, eating and drinking such things as they give:
for the laborer is worthy of his hire. Go not from house to house.
8 And into whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you, eat such things as
are set before you:
9 and heal the sick that are therein, and say unto them, The kingdom of God is
come nigh unto you.
10 But into whatsoever city ye shall enter, and they receive you not, go out
into the streets thereof and say,
11 Even the dust from your city, that cleaveth to our feet, we wipe off against
you: nevertheless know this, that the kingdom of God is come nigh.
12 I say unto you, it shall be more tolerable in that day for Sodom, than for
that city.
13 Woe unto thee, Chorazin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the mighty works
had been done in Tyre and Sidon, which were done in you, they would have
repented long ago, sitting in sackcloth and ashes.
14 But it shall be more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon in the judgment, than for
you.
15 And thou, Capernaum, shalt thou be exalted unto heaven? thou shalt be brought
down unto Hades.
16 He that heareth you heareth me; and he that rejecteth you rejecteth me; and
he that rejecteth me rejecteth him that sent me.
17 And the seventy returned with joy, saying, Lord, even the demons are subject
unto us in thy name.
18 And he said unto them, I beheld Satan fallen as lightning from heaven.
19 Behold, I have given you authority to tread upon serpents and scorpions, and
over all the power of the enemy: and nothing shall in any wise hurt you.
20 Nevertheless in this rejoice not, that the spirits are subject unto you; but
rejoice that your names are written in heaven.
21 In that same hour he rejoiced in the Holy Spirit, and said, I thank thee, O
Father, Lord of heaven and earth, that thou didst hide these things from the
wise and understanding, and didst reveal them unto babes: yea, Father; for so it
was well-pleasing in thy sight.
22 All things have been delivered unto me of my Father: and no one knoweth who
the Son is, save the Father; and who the Father is, save the Son, and he to
whomsoever the Son willeth to reveal [him] .
23 And turning to the disciples, he said privately, Blessed [are] the eyes which
see the things that ye see:
24 for I say unto you, that many prophets and kings desired to see the things
which ye see, and saw them not; and to hear the things which ye hear, and heard
them not.
25 And behold, a certain lawyer stood up and made trial of him, saying, Teacher,
what shall I do to inherit eternal life?
26 And he said unto him, What is written in the law? how readest thou?
27 And he answering said, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart,
and with all thy soul, and with all thy strength, and with all thy mind; and thy
neighbor as thyself.
28 And he said unto him, Thou hast answered right: this do, and thou shalt live.
29 But he, desiring to justify himself, said unto Jesus, And who is my neighbor?
30 Jesus made answer and said, A certain man was going down from Jerusalem to
Jericho; and he fell among robbers, who both stripped him and beat him, and
departed, leaving him half dead.
31 And by chance a certain priest was going down that way: and when he saw him,
he passed by on the other side.
32 And in like manner a Levite also, when he came to the place, and saw him,
passed by on the other side.
33 But a certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and when he saw
him, he was moved with compassion,
34 and came to him, and bound up his wounds, pouring on [them] oil and wine; and
he set him on his own beast, and brought him to an inn, and took care of him.
35 And on the morrow he took out two shillings, and gave them to the host, and
said, Take care of him; and whatsoever thou spendest more, I, when I come back
again, will repay thee.
36 Which of these three, thinkest thou, proved neighbor unto him that fell among
the robbers?
37 And he said, He that showed mercy on him. And Jesus said unto him, Go, and do
thou likewise.
38 Now as they went on their way, he entered into a certain village: and a
certain woman named Martha received him into her house.
39 And she had a sister called Mary, who also sat at the Lord's feet, and heard
his word.
40 But Martha was cumbered about much serving; and she came up to him, and said,
Lord, dost thou not care that my sister did leave me to serve alone? bid her
therefore that she help me.
41 But the Lord answered and said unto her, Martha, Martha, thou art anxious and
troubled about many things:
42 but one thing is needful: for Mary hath chosen the good part, which shall not
be taken away from her.

Chapter 11

1 And it came to pass, as he was praying in a certain place, that when he
ceased, one of his disciples said unto him, Lord, teach us to pray, even as John
also taught his disciples.
2 And he said unto them, When ye pray, say, Father, Hallowed be thy name. Thy
kingdom come.
3 Give us day by day our daily bread.
4 And forgive us our sins; for we ourselves also forgive every one that is
indebted to us. And bring us not into temptation.
5 And he said unto them, Which of you shall have a friend, and shall go unto him
at midnight, and say to him, Friend, lend me three loaves;
6 for a friend of mine is come to me from a journey, and I have nothing to set
before him;
7 and he from within shall answer and say, Trouble me not: the door is now shut,
and my children are with me in bed; I cannot rise and give thee?
8 I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him because he is his friend,
yet because of his importunity he will arise and give him as many as he needeth.
9 And I say unto you, Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find;
knock, and it shall be opened unto you.
10 For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him
that knocketh it shall be opened.
11 And of which of you that is a father shall his son ask a loaf, and he give
him a stone? or a fish, and he for a fish give him a serpent?
12 Or [if] he shall ask an egg, will he give him a scorpion?
13 If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children, how
much more shall [your] heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask
him?
14 And he was casting out a demon [that was] dumb. And it came to pass, when the
demon was gone out, the dumb man spake; and the multitudes marvelled.
15 But some of them said, By Beelzebub the prince of the demons casteth he out
demons.
16 And others, trying [him], sought of him a sign from heaven.
17 But he, knowing their thoughts, said unto them, Every kingdom divided against
itself is brought to desolation; and a house [divided] against a house falleth.
18 And if Satan also is divided against himself, how shall his kingdom stand?
because ye say that I cast out demons by Beelzebub.
19 And if I by Beelzebub cast out demons, by whom do your sons cast them out?
therefore shall they be your judges.
20 But if I by the finger of God cast out demons, then is the kingdom of God
come upon you.
21 When the strong [man] fully armed guardeth his own court, his goods are in
peace:
22 but when a stronger than he shall come upon him, and overcome him, he taketh
from him his whole armor wherein he trusted, and divideth his spoils.
23 He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me
scattereth.
24 The unclean spirit when he is gone out of the man, passeth through waterless
places, seeking rest, and finding none, he saith, I will turn back unto my house
whence I came out.
25 And when he is come, he findeth it swept and garnished.
26 Then goeth he, and taketh [to him] seven other spirits more evil than
himself; and they enter in and dwell there: and the last state of that man
becometh worse than the first.
27 And it came to pass, as he said these things, a certain woman out of the
multitude lifted up her voice, and said unto him, Blessed is the womb that bare
thee, and the breasts which thou didst suck.
28 But he said, Yea rather, blessed are they that hear the word of God, and keep
it.
29 And when the multitudes were gathering together unto him, he began to say,
This generation is an evil generation: it seeketh after a sign; and there shall
no sign be given to it but the sign of Jonah.
30 For even as Jonah became a sign unto the Ninevites, so shall also the Son of
man be to this generation.
31 The queen of the south shall rise up in the judgment with the men of this
generation, and shall condemn them: for she came from the ends of the earth to
hear the wisdom of Solomon; and behold, a greater than Solomon is here.
32 The men of Nineveh shall stand up in the judgment with this generation, and
shall condemn it: for they repented at the preaching of Jonah; and behold, a
greater than Jonah is here.
33 No man, when he hath lighted a lamp, putteth it in a cellar, neither under
the bushel, but on the stand, that they which enter in may see the light.
34 The lamp of thy body is thine eye: when thine eye is single, thy whole body
also is full of light; but when it is evil, thy body also is full of darkness.
35 Look therefore whether the light that is in thee be not darkness.
36 If therefore thy whole body be full of light, having no part dark, it shall
be wholly full of light, as when the lamp with its bright shining doth give thee
light.
37 Now as he spake, a Pharisee asketh him to dine with him: and he went in, and
sat down to meat.
38 And when the Pharisee saw it, he marvelled that he had not first bathed
himself before dinner.
39 And the Lord said unto him, Now ye the Pharisees cleanse the outside of the
cup and of the platter; but your inward part is full of extortion and
wickedness.
40 Ye foolish ones, did not he that made the outside make the inside also?
41 But give for alms those things which are within; and behold, all things are
clean unto you.
42 But woe unto you Pharisees! for ye tithe mint and rue and every herb, and
pass over justice and the love of God: but these ought ye to have done, and not
to leave the other undone.
43 Woe unto you Pharisees! for ye love the chief seats in the synagogues, and
the salutations in the marketplaces.
44 Woe unto you! for ye are as the tombs which appear not, and the men that walk
over [them] know it not.
45 And one of the lawyers answering saith unto him, Teacher, in saying this thou
reproachest us also.
46 And he said, Woe unto you lawyers also! for ye load men with burdens grievous
to be borne, and ye yourselves touch not the burdens with one of your fingers.
47 Woe unto you! for ye build the tombs of the prophets, and your fathers killed
them.
48 So ye are witnesses and consent unto the works of your fathers: for they
killed them, and ye build [their tombs] .
49 Therefore also said the wisdom of God, I will send unto them prophets and
apostles; and [some] of them they shall kill and persecute;
50 that the blood of all the prophets, which was shed from the foundation of the
world, may be required of this generation;
51 from the blood of Abel unto the blood of Zachariah, who perished between the
altar and the sanctuary: yea, I say unto you, it shall be required of this
generation.
52 Woe unto you lawyers! for ye took away the key of knowledge: ye entered not
in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered.
53 And when he was come out from thence, the scribes and the Pharisees began to
press upon [him] vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of many things;
54 laying wait for him, to catch something out of his mouth.

Chapter 12

1 In the mean time, when the many thousands of the multitude were gathered
together, insomuch that they trod one upon another, he began to say unto his
disciples first of all, Beware ye of the leaven of the Pharisees, which is
hypocrisy.
2 But there is nothing covered up, that shall not be revealed; and hid, that
shall not be known.
3 Wherefore whatsoever ye have said in the darkness shall be heard in the light;
and what ye have spoken in the ear in the inner chambers shall be proclaimed
upon the housetops.
4 And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill the body, and
after that have no more that they can do.
5 But I will warn you whom ye shall fear: Fear him, who after he hath killed
hath power to cast into hell; yea, I say unto you, Fear him.
6 Are not five sparrows sold for two pence? and not one of them is forgotten in
the sight of God.
7 But the very hairs of your head are all numbered. Fear not: ye are of more
value than many sparrows.
8 And I say unto you, Every one who shall confess me before men, him shall the
Son of man also confess before the angels of God:
9 but he that denieth me in the presence of men shall be denied in the presence
of the angels of God.
10 And every one who shall speak a word against the Son of man, it shall be
forgiven him: but unto him that blasphemeth against the Holy Spirit it shall not
be forgiven.
11 And when they bring you before the synagogues, and the rulers, and the
authorities, be not anxious how or what ye shall answer, or what ye shall say:
12 for the Holy Spirit shall teach you in that very hour what ye ought to say.
13 And one out of the multitude said unto him, Teacher, bid my brother divide
the inheritance with me.
14 But he said unto him, Man, who made me a judge or a divider over you?
15 And he said unto them, Take heed, and keep yourselves from all covetousness:
for a man's life consisteth not in the abundance of the things which he
possesseth.
16 And he spake a parable unto them, saying, The ground of a certain rich man
brought forth plentifully:
17 and he reasoned within himself, saying, What shall I do, because I have not
where to bestow my fruits?
18 And he said, This will I do: I will pull down my barns, and build greater;
and there will I bestow all my grain and my goods.
19 And I will say to my soul, Soul, thou hast much goods laid up for many years;
take thine ease, eat, drink, be merry.
20 But God said unto him, Thou foolish one, this night is thy soul required of
thee; and the things which thou hast prepared, whose shall they be?
21 So is he that layeth up treasure for himself, and is not rich toward God.
22 And he said unto his disciples, Therefore I say unto you, Be not anxious for
[your] life, what ye shall eat; nor yet for your body, what ye shall put on.
23 For the life is more than the food, and the body than the raiment.
24 Consider the ravens, that they sow not, neither reap; which have no
store-chamber nor barn; and God feedeth them: of how much more value are ye than
the birds!
25 And which of you by being anxious can add a cubit unto the measure of his
life?
26 If then ye are not able to do even that which is least, why are ye anxious
concerning the rest?
27 Consider the lilies, how they grow: they toil not, neither do they spin; yet
I say unto you, Even Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these.
28 But if God doth so clothe the grass in the field, which to-day is, and
to-morrow is cast into the oven; how much more [shall he clothe] you, O ye of
little faith?
29 And seek not ye what ye shall eat, and what ye shall drink, neither be ye of
doubtful mind.
30 For all these things do the nations of the world seek after: but your Father
knoweth that ye have need of these things.
31 Yet seek ye his kingdom, and these things shall be added unto you.
32 Fear not, little flock; for it is your Father's good pleasure to give you the
kingdom.
33 Sell that which ye have, and give alms; make for yourselves purses which wax
not old, a treasure in the heavens that faileth not, where no thief draweth
near, neither moth destroyeth.
34 For where your treasure is, there will your heart be also.
35 Let your loins be girded about, and your lamps burning;
36 and be ye yourselves like unto men looking for their lord, when he shall
return from the marriage feast; that, when he cometh and knocketh, they may
straightway open unto him.
37 Blessed are those servants, whom the lord when he cometh shall find watching:
verily I say unto you, that he shall gird himself, and make them sit down to
meat, and shall come and serve them. [
38 And if he shall come in the second watch, and if in the third, and find
[them] so, blessed are those [servants] .
39 But know this, that if the master of the house had known in what hour the
thief was coming, he would have watched, and not have left his house to be
broken through. [
40 Be ye also ready: for in an hour that ye think not the Son of man cometh.
41 And Peter said, Lord, speakest thou this parable unto us, or even unto all?
42 And the Lord said, Who then is the faithful and wise steward, whom his lord
shall set over his household, to give them their portion of food in due season?
43 Blessed is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall find so doing.
44 Of a truth I say unto you, that he will set him over all that he hath.
45 But if that servant shall say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and
shall begin to beat the menservants and the maidservants, and to eat and drink,
and to be drunken;
46 the lord of that servant shall come in a day when he expecteth not, and in an
hour when he knoweth not, and shall cut him asunder, and appoint his portion
with the unfaithful.
47 And that servant, who knew his lord's will, and made not ready, nor did
according to his will, shall be beaten with many [stripes] ;
48 but he that knew not, and did things worthy of stripes, shall be beaten with
few [stripes] . And to whomsoever much is given, of him shall much be required:
and to whom they commit much, of him will they ask the more.
49 I came to cast fire upon the earth; and what do I desire, if it is already
kindled?
50 But I have a baptism to be baptized with; and how am I straitened till it be
accomplished!
51 Think ye that I am come to give peace in the earth? I tell you, Nay; but
rather division:
52 for there shall be from henceforth five in one house divided, three against
two, and two against three.
53 They shall be divided, father against son, and son against father; mother
against daughter, and daughter against her mother; mother in law against her
daughter in law, and daughter in law against her mother in law.
54 And he said to the multitudes also, When ye see a cloud rising in the west,
straightway ye say, There cometh a shower; and so it cometh to pass.
55 And when [ye see] a south wind blowing, ye say, There will be a scorching
heat; and it cometh to pass.
56 Ye hypocrites, ye know how to interpret the face of the earth and the heaven;
but how is it that ye know not how to interpret this time?
57 And why even of yourselves judge ye not what is right?
58 For as thou art going with thine adversary before the magistrate, on the way
give diligence to be quit of him; lest haply he drag thee unto the judge, and
the judge shall deliver thee to the officer, and the officer shall cast thee
into prison.
59 I say unto thee, Thou shalt by no means come out thence, till thou have paid
the very last mite.

Chapter 13

1 Now there were some present at that very season who told him of the
Galilaeans, whose blood Pilate had mingled with their sacrifices.
2 And he answered and said unto them, Think ye that these Galilaeans were
sinners above all the Galilaeans, because they have suffered these things?
3 I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all in like manner perish.
4 Or those eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and killed them, think
ye that they were offenders above all the men that dwell in Jerusalem?
5 I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish.
6 And he spake this parable; A certain man had a fig tree planted in his
vineyard; and he came seeking fruit thereon, and found none.
7 And he said unto the vinedresser, Behold, these three years I come seeking
fruit on this fig tree, and find none: cut it down; why doth it also cumber the
ground?
8 And he answering saith unto him, Lord, let it alone this year also, till I
shall dig about it, and dung it:
9 and if it bear fruit thenceforth, [well] ; but if not, thou shalt cut it down.
10 And he was teaching in one of the synagogues on the sabbath day.
11 And behold, a woman that had a spirit of infirmity eighteen years; and she
was bowed together, and could in no wise lift herself up.
12 And when Jesus saw her, he called her, and said to her, Woman, thou art
loosed from thine infirmity.
13 And he laid his hands upon her: and immediately she was made straight, and
glorified God.
14 And the ruler of the synagogue, being moved with indignation because Jesus
had healed on the sabbath, answered and said to the multitude, There are six
days in which men ought to work: in them therefore come and be healed, and not
on the day of the sabbath.
15 But the Lord answered him, and said, Ye hypocrites, doth not each one of you
on the sabbath loose his ox or his ass from the stall, and lead him away to
watering?
16 And ought not this woman, being a daughter of Abraham, whom Satan had bound,
lo, [these] eighteen years, to have been loosed from this bond on the day of the
sabbath?
17 And as he said these things, all his adversaries were put to shame: and all
the multitude rejoiced for all the glorious things that were done by him.
18 He said therefore, Unto what is the kingdom of God like? and whereunto shall
I liken it?
19 It is like unto a grain of mustard seed, which a man took, and cast into his
own garden; and it grew, and became a tree; and the birds of the heaven lodged
in the branches thereof.
20 And again he said, Whereunto shall I liken the kingdom of God?
21 It is like unto leaven, which a woman took and hid in three measures of meal,
till it was all leavened.
22 And he went on his way through cities and villages, teaching, and journeying
on unto Jerusalem.
23 And one said unto him, Lord, are they few that are saved? And he said unto
them,
24 Strive to enter in by the narrow door: for many, I say unto you, shall seek
to enter in, and shall not be able.
25 When once the master of the house is risen up, and hath shut to the door, and
ye begin to stand without, and to knock at the door, saying, Lord, open to us;
and he shall answer and say to you, I know you not whence ye are;
26 then shall ye begin to say, We did eat and drink in thy presence, and thou
didst teach in our streets;
27 and he shall say, I tell you, I know not whence ye are; depart from me, all
ye workers of iniquity.
28 There shall be the weeping and the gnashing of teeth, when ye shall see
Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob, and all the prophets, in the kingdom of God, and
yourselves cast forth without.
29 And they shall come from the east and west, and from the north and south, and
shall sit down in the kingdom of God.
30 And behold, there are last who shall be first, and there are first who shall
be last.
31 In that very hour there came certain Pharisees, saying to him, Get thee out,
and go hence: for Herod would fain kill thee.
32 And he said unto them, Go and say to that fox, Behold, I cast out demons and
perform cures to-day and to-morrow, and the third [day] I am perfected.
33 Nevertheless I must go on my way to-day and to-morrow and the [day]
following: for it cannot be that a prophet perish out of Jerusalem.
34 O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, that killeth the prophets, and stoneth them that are
sent unto her! how often would I have gathered thy children together, even as a
hen [gathereth] her own brood under her wings, and ye would not!
35 Behold, your house is left unto you [desolate] : and I say unto you, Ye shall
not see me, until ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the
Lord.

Chapter 14

1 And it came to pass, when he went into the house of one of the rulers of the
Pharisees on a sabbath to eat bread, that they were watching him.
2 And behold, there was before him a certain man that had the dropsy.
3 And Jesus answering spake unto the lawyers and Pharisees, saying, Is it lawful
to heal on the sabbath, or not?
4 But they held their peace. And he took him, and healed him, and let him go.
5 And he said unto them, Which of you shall have an ass or an ox fallen into a
well, and will not straightway draw him up on a sabbath day?
6 And they could not answer again unto these things.
7 And he spake a parable unto those that were bidden, when he marked how they
chose out the chief seats; saying unto them,
8 When thou art bidden of any man to a marriage feast, sit not down in the chief
seat; lest haply a more honorable man than thou be bidden of him,
9 and he that bade thee and him shall come and say to thee, Give this man place;
and then thou shalt begin with shame to take the lowest place.
10 But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest place; that when he
that hath bidden thee cometh, he may say to thee, Friend, go up higher: then
shalt thou have glory in the presence of all that sit at meat with thee.
11 For every one that exalteth himself shall be humbled; and he that humbleth
himself shall be exalted.
12 And he said to him also that had bidden him, When thou makest a dinner or a
supper, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, nor thy kinsmen, nor rich
neighbors; lest haply they also bid thee again, and a recompense be made thee.
13 But when thou makest a feast, bid the poor, the maimed, the lame, the blind:
14 and thou shalt be blessed; because they have not [wherewith] to recompense
thee: for thou shalt be recompensed in the resurrection of the just.
15 And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these things, he said
unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the kingdom of God.
16 But he said unto him, A certain man made a great supper; and he bade many:
17 and he sent forth his servant at supper time to say to them that were bidden,
Come; for [all] things are now ready.
18 And they all with one [consent] began to make excuse. The first said unto
him, I have bought a field, and I must needs go out and see it; I pray thee have
me excused.
19 And another said, I have bought five yoke of oxen, and I go to prove them; I
pray thee have me excused.
20 And another said, I have married a wife, and therefore I cannot come.
21 And the servant came, and told his lord these things. Then the master of the
house being angry said to his servant, Go out quickly into the streets and lanes
of the city, and bring in hither the poor and maimed and blind and lame.
22 And the servant said, Lord, what thou didst command is done, and yet there is
room.
23 And the lord said unto the servant, Go out into the highways and hedges, and
constrain [them] to come in, that my house may be filled.
24 For I say unto you, that none of those men that were bidden shall taste of my
supper.
25 Now there went with him great multitudes: and he turned, and said unto them,
26 If any man cometh unto me, and hateth not his own father, and mother, and
wife, and children, and brethren, and sisters, yea, and his own life also, he
cannot be my disciple.
27 Whosoever doth not bear his own cross, and come after me, cannot be my
disciple.
28 For which of you, desiring to build a tower, doth not first sit down and
count the cost, whether he have [wherewith] to complete it?
29 Lest haply, when he hath laid a foundation, and is not able to finish, all
that behold begin to mock him,
30 saying, This man began to build, and was not able to finish.
31 Or what king, as he goeth to encounter another king in war, will not sit down
first and take counsel whether he is able with ten thousand to meet him that
cometh against him with twenty thousand?
32 Or else, while the other is yet a great way off, he sendeth an ambassage, and
asketh conditions of peace.
33 So therefore whosoever he be of you that renounceth not all that he hath, he
cannot be my disciple.
34 Salt therefore is good: but if even the salt have lost its savor, wherewith
shall it be seasoned?
35 It is fit neither for the land nor for the dunghill: [men] cast it out. He
that hath ears to hear, let him hear.

Chapter 15

1 Now all the publicans and sinners were drawing near unto him to hear him.
2 And both the Pharisees and the scribes murmured, saying, This man receiveth
sinners, and eateth with them.
3 And he spake unto them this parable, saying,
4 What man of you, having a hundred sheep, and having lost one of them, doth not
leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is lost,
until he find it?
5 And when he hath found it, he layeth it on his shoulders, rejoicing.
6 And when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and his neighbors,
saying unto them, Rejoice with me, for I have found my sheep which was lost.
7 I say unto you, that even so there shall be joy in heaven over one sinner that
repenteth, [more] than over ninety and nine righteous persons, who need no
repentance.
8 Or what woman having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one piece, doth not
light a lamp, and sweep the house, and seek diligently until she find it?
9 And when she hath found it, she calleth together her friends and neighbors,
saying, Rejoice with me, for I have found the piece which I had lost.
10 Even so, I say unto you, there is joy in the presence of the angels of God
over one sinner that repenteth.
11 And he said, A certain man had two sons:
12 and the younger of them said to his father, Father, give me the portion of
[thy] substance that falleth to me. And he divided unto them his living.
13 And not many days after, the younger son gathered all together and took his
journey into a far country; and there he wasted his substance with riotous
living.
14 And when he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that country; and
he began to be in want.
15 And he went and joined himself to one of the citizens of that country; and he
sent him into his fields to feed swine.
16 And he would fain have filled his belly with the husks that the swine did
eat: and no man gave unto him.
17 But when he came to himself he said, How many hired servants of my father's
have bread enough and to spare, and I perish here with hunger!
18 I will arise and go to my father, and will say unto him, Father, I have
sinned against heaven, and in thy sight:
19 I am no more worthy to be called your son: make me as one of thy hired
servants.
20 And he arose, and came to his father. But while he was yet afar off, his
father saw him, and was moved with compassion, and ran, and fell on his neck,
and kissed him.
21 And the son said unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and in thy
sight: I am no more worthy to be called thy son .
22 But the father said to his servants, Bring forth quickly the best robe, and
put it on him; and put a ring on his hand, and shoes on his feet:
23 and bring the fatted calf, [and] kill it, and let us eat, and make merry:
24 for this my son was dead, and is alive again; he was lost, and is found. And
they began to be merry.
25 Now his elder son was in the field: and as he came and drew nigh to the
house, he heard music and dancing.
26 And he called to him one of the servants, and inquired what these things
might be.
27 And he said unto him, Thy brother is come; and thy father hath killed the
fatted calf, because he hath received him safe and sound.
28 But he was angry, and would not go in: and his father came out, and entreated
him.
29 But he answered and said to his father, Lo, these many years do I serve thee,
and I never transgressed a commandment of thine; and [yet] thou never gavest me
a kid, that I might make merry with my friends:
30 but when this thy son came, who hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou
killedst for him the fatted calf.
31 And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that is mine is
thine.
32 But it was meet to make merry and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and
is alive [again] ; and [was] lost, and is found.

Chapter 16

1 And he said also unto the disciples, There was a certain rich man, who had a
steward; and the same was accused unto him that he was wasting his goods.
2 And he called him, and said unto him, What is this that I hear of thee? render
the account of thy stewardship; for thou canst be no longer steward.
3 And the steward said within himself, What shall I do, seeing that my lord
taketh away the stewardship from me? I have not strength to dig; to beg I am
ashamed.
4 I am resolved what to do, that, when I am put out of the stewardship, they may
receive me into their houses.
5 And calling to him each one of his lord's debtors, he said to the first, How
much owest thou unto my lord?
6 And he said, A hundred measures of oil. And he said unto him, Take thy bond,
and sit down quickly and write fifty.
7 Then said he to another, And how much owest thou? And he said, A hundred
measures of wheat. He saith unto him, Take thy bond, and write fourscore.
8 And his lord commended the unrighteous steward because he had done wisely: for
the sons of this world are for their own generation wiser than the sons of the
light.
9 And I say unto you, Make to yourselves friends by means of the mammon of
unrighteousness; that, when it shall fail, they may receive you into the eternal
tabernacles.
10 He that is faithful in a very little is faithful also in much: and he that is
unrighteous in a very little is unrighteous also in much.
11 If therefore ye have not been faithful in the unrighteous mammon, who will
commit to your trust the true [riches] ?
12 And if ye have not been faithful in that which is another's, who will give
you that which is your own?
13 No servant can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one, and love
the other; or else he will hold to one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve
God and mammon.
14 And the Pharisees, who were lovers of money, heard all these things; and they
scoffed at him.
15 And he said unto them, Ye are they that justify yourselves in the sight of
men; but God knoweth your hearts: for that which is exalted among men is an
abomination in the sight of God.
16 The law and the prophets [were] until John: from that time the gospel of the
kingdom of God is preached, and every man entereth violently into it.
17 But it is easier for heaven and earth to pass away, than for one tittle of
the law to fall.
18 Every one that putteth away his wife, and marrieth another, committeth
adultery: and he that marrieth one that is put away from a husband committeth
adultery.
19 Now there was a certain rich man, and he was clothed in purple and fine
linen, faring sumptuously every day:
20 and a certain beggar named Lazarus was laid at his gate, full of sores,
21 and desiring to be fed with the [crumbs] that fell from the rich man's table;
yea, even the dogs came and licked his sores.
22 And it came to pass, that the beggar died, and that he was carried away by
the angels into Abraham's bosom: and the rich man also died, and was buried.
23 And in Hades he lifted up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham afar
off, and Lazarus in his bosom.
24 And he cried and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus,
that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am in
anguish in this flame.
25 But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good
things, and Lazarus in like manner evil things: but now here he is comforted,
and thou art in anguish.
26 And besides all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed, that
they that would pass from hence to you may not be able, and that none may cross
over from thence to us.
27 And he said, I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest send him to my
father's house;
28 for I have five brethren; that he may testify unto them, lest they also come
into this place of torment.
29 But Abraham saith, They have Moses and the prophets; let them hear them.
30 And he said, Nay, father Abraham: but if one go to them from the dead, they
will repent.
31 And he said unto him, If they hear not Moses and the prophets, neither will
they be persuaded, if one rise from the dead.

Chapter 17

1 And he said unto his disciples, It is impossible but that occasions of
stumbling should come; but woe unto him, through whom they come!
2 It were well for him if a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he were
thrown into the sea, rather than that he should cause one of these little ones
to stumble.
3 Take heed to yourselves: if thy brother sin, rebuke him; and if he repent,
forgive him.
4 And if he sin against thee seven times in the day, and seven times turn again
to thee, saying, I repent; thou shalt forgive him.
5 And the apostles said unto the Lord, Increase our faith.
6 And the Lord said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye would say
unto this sycamine tree, Be thou rooted up, and be thou planted in the sea; and
it would obey you.
7 But who is there of you, having a servant plowing or keeping sheep, that will
say unto him, when he is come in from the field, Come straightway and sit down
to meat;
8 and will not rather say unto him, Make ready wherewith I may sup, and gird
thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten and drunken; and afterward thou shalt
eat and drink?
9 Doth he thank the servant because he did the things that were commanded?
10 Even so ye also, when ye shall have done all the things that are commanded
you, say, We are unprofitable servants; we have done that which it was our duty
to do.
11 And it came to pass, as they were on the way to Jerusalem, that he was
passing along the borders of Samaria and Galilee.
12 And as he entered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were
lepers, who stood afar off:
13 and they lifted up their voices, saying, Jesus, Master, have mercy on us.
14 And when he saw them, he said unto them, Go and show yourselves unto the
priests. And it came to pass, as they went, they were cleansed.
15 And one of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back, with a loud
voice glorifying God;
16 and he fell upon his face at his feet, giving him thanks: and he was a
Samaritan.
17 And Jesus answering said, Were not the ten cleansed? but where are the nine?
18 Were there none found that returned to give glory to God, save this stranger?
19 And he said unto him, Arise, and go thy way: thy faith hath made thee whole.
20 And being asked by the Pharisees, when the kingdom of God cometh, he answered
them and said, The kingdom of God cometh not with observation:
21 neither shall they say, Lo, here! or, There! for lo, the kingdom of God is
within you.
22 And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye shall desire to
see one of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall not see it.
23 And they shall say to you, Lo, there! Lo, here! go not away, nor follow after
[them] :
24 for as the lightning, when it lighteneth out of the one part under the
heaven, shineth unto the other part under heaven; so shall the Son of man be in
his day.
25 But first must he suffer many things and be rejected of this generation.
26 And as it came to pass in the days of Noah, even so shall it be also in the
days of the Son of man.
27 They ate, they drank, they married, they were given in marriage, until the
day that Noah entered into the ark, and the flood came, and destroyed them all.
28 Likewise even as it came to pass in the days of Lot; they ate, they drank,
they bought, they sold, they planted, they builded;
29 but in the day that Lot went out from Sodom it rained fire and brimstone from
heaven, and destroyed them all:
30 after the same manner shall it be in the day that the Son of man is revealed.
31 In that day, he that shall be on the housetop, and his goods in the house,
let him not go down to take them away: and let him that is in the field likewise
not return back.
32 Remember Lot's wife.
33 Whosoever shall seek to gain his life shall lose it: but whosoever shall lose
[his life] shall preserve it.
34 I say unto you, In that night there shall be two men on one bed; the one
shall be taken, and the other shall be left.
35 There shall be two women grinding together; the one shall be taken, and the
other shall be left.
36 (Ommitted)
37 And they answering say unto him, Where, Lord? And he said unto them, Where
the body [is], thither will the eagles also be gathered together.

Chapter 18

1 And he spake a parable unto them to the end that they ought always to pray,
and not to faint;
2 saying, There was in a city a judge, who feared not God, and regarded not man:
3 and there was a widow in that city; and she came oft unto him, saying, Avenge
me of mine adversary.
4 And he would not for a while: but afterward he said within himself, Though I
fear not God, nor regard man;
5 yet because this widow troubleth me, I will avenge her, lest she wear me out
by her continual coming.
6 And the Lord said, Hear what the unrighteous judge saith.
7 And shall not God avenge his elect, that cry to him day and night, and [yet]
he is longsuffering over them?
8 I say unto you, that he will avenge them speedily. Nevertheless, when the Son
of man cometh, shall he find faith on the earth?
9 And he spake also this parable unto certain who trusted in themselves that
they were righteous, and set all others at nought:
10 Two men went up into the temple to pray; the one a Pharisee, and the other a
publican.
11 The Pharisee stood and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank thee, that I am
not as the rest of men, extortioners, unjust, adulterers, or even as this
publican.
12 I fast twice in the week; I give tithes of all that I get.
13 But the publican, standing afar off, would not lift up so much as his eyes
unto heaven, but smote his breast, saying, God, be thou merciful to me a sinner.
14 I say unto you, This man went down to his house justified rather than the
other: for every one that exalteth himself shall be humbled; but he that
humbleth himself shall be exalted.
15 And they were bringing unto him also their babes, that he should touch them:
but when the disciples saw it, they rebuked them.
16 But Jesus called them unto him, saying, Suffer the little children to come
unto me, and forbid them not: for to such belongeth the kingdom of God.
17 Verily I say unto you, Whosoever shall not receive the kingdom of God as a
little child, he shall in no wise enter therein.
18 And a certain ruler asked him, saying, Good Teacher, what shall I do to
inherit eternal life?
19 And Jesus said unto him, Why callest thou me good? none is good, save one,
[even] God.
20 Thou knowest the commandments, Do not commit adultery, Do not kill, Do not
steal, Do not bear false witness, Honor thy father and mother.
21 And he said, All these things have I observed from my youth up.
22 And when Jesus heard it, he said unto him, One thing thou lackest yet: sell
all that thou hast, and distribute unto the poor, and thou shalt have treasure
in heaven: and come, follow me.
23 But when he heard these things, he became exceeding sorrowful; for he was
very rich.
24 And Jesus seeing him said, How hardly shall they that have riches enter into
the kingdom of God!
25 For it is easier for a camel to enter in through a needle's eye, than for a
rich man to enter into the kingdom of God.
26 And they that heard it said, Then who can be saved?
27 But he said, The things which are impossible with men are possible with God.
28 And Peter said, Lo, we have left our own, and followed thee.
29 And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left
house, or wife, or brethren, or parents, or children, for the kingdom of God's
sake,
30 who shall not receive manifold more in this time, and in the world to come
eternal life.
31 And he took unto him the twelve, and said unto them, Behold, we go up to
Jerusalem, and all the things that are written through the prophets shall be
accomplished unto the Son of man.
32 For he shall be delivered up unto the Gentiles, and shall be mocked, and
shamefully treated, and spit upon:
33 and they shall scourge and kill him: and the third day he shall rise again.
34 And they understood none of these things; and this saying was hid from them,
and they perceived not the things that were said.
35 And it came to pass, as he drew nigh unto Jericho, a certain blind man sat by
the way side begging:
36 and hearing a multitude going by, he inquired what this meant.
37 And they told him, that Jesus of Nazareth passeth by.
38 And he cried, saying, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on me.
39 And they that went before rebuked him, that he should hold his peace: but he
cried out the more a great deal, Thou son of David, have mercy on me.
40 And Jesus stood, and commanded him to be brought unto him: and when he was
come near, he asked him,
41 What wilt thou that I should do unto thee? And he said, Lord, that I may
receive my sight.
42 And Jesus said unto him, Receive thy sight; thy faith hath made thee whole.
43 And immediately he received his sight, and followed him, glorifying God: and
all the people, when they saw it, gave praise unto God.

Chapter 19

1 And he entered and was passing through Jericho.
2 And behold, a man called by name Zacchaeus; and he was a chief publican, and
he was rich.
3 And he sought to see Jesus who he was; and could not for the crowd, because he
was little of stature.
4 And he ran on before, and climbed up into a sycomore tree to see him: for he
was to pass that way.
5 And when Jesus came to the place, he looked up, and said unto him, Zacchaeus,
make haste, and come down; for to-day I must abide at thy house.
6 And he made haste, and came down, and received him joyfully.
7 And when they saw it, they all murmured, saying, He is gone in to lodge with a
man that is a sinner.
8 And Zacchaeus stood, and said unto the Lord, Behold, Lord, the half of my
goods I give to the poor; and if I have wrongfully exacted aught of any man, I
restore fourfold.
9 And Jesus said unto him, To-day is salvation come to this house, forasmuch as
he also is a son of Abraham.
10 For the Son of man came to seek and to save that which was lost.
11 And as they heard these things, he added and spake a parable, because he was
nigh to Jerusalem, and [because] they supposed that the kingdom of God was
immediately to appear.
12 He said therefore, A certain nobleman went into a far country, to receive for
himself a kingdom, and to return.
13 And he called ten servants of his, and gave them ten pounds, and said unto
them, Trade ye [herewith] till I come.
14 But his citizens hated him, and sent an ambassage after him, saying, We will
not that this man reign over us.
15 And it came to pass, when he was come back again, having received the
kingdom, that he commanded these servants, unto whom he had given the money, to
be called to him, that he might know what they had gained by trading.
16 And the first came before him, saying, Lord, thy pound hath made ten pounds
more.
17 And he said unto him, Well done, thou good servant: because thou wast found
faithful in a very little, have thou authority over ten cities.
18 And the second came, saying, Thy pound, Lord, hath made five pounds.
19 And he said unto him also, Be thou also over five cities.
20 And another came, saying, Lord, behold, [here is] thy pound, which I kept
laid up in a napkin:
21 for I feared thee, because thou art an austere man: thou takest up that which
thou layedst not down, and reapest that which thou didst not sow.
22 He saith unto him, Out of thine own mouth will I judge thee, thou wicked
servant. Thou knewest that I am an austere man, taking up that which I laid not
down, and reaping that which I did not sow;
23 then wherefore gavest thou not my money into the bank, and I at my coming
should have required it with interest?
24 And he said unto them that stood by, Take away from him the pound, and give
it unto him that hath the ten pounds.
25 And they said unto him, Lord, he hath ten pounds.
26 I say unto you, that unto every one that hath shall be given; but from him
that hath not, even that which he hath shall be taken away from him.
27 But these mine enemies, that would not that I should reign over them, bring
hither, and slay them before me.
28 And when he had thus spoken, he went on before, going up to Jerusalem.
29 And it came to pass, when he drew nigh unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the
mount that is called Olivet, he sent two of the disciples,
30 saying, Go your way into the village over against [you] ; in which as ye
enter ye shall find a colt tied, whereon no man ever yet sat: loose him, and
bring him.
31 And if any one ask you, Why do ye loose him? thus shall ye say, The Lord hath
need of him.
32 And they that were sent went away, and found even as he had said unto them.
33 And as they were loosing the colt, the owners thereof said unto them, Why
loose ye the colt?
34 And they said, The Lord hath need of him.
35 And they brought him to Jesus: and they threw their garments upon the colt,
and set Jesus thereon.
36 And as he went, they spread their garments in the way.
37 And as he was now drawing nigh, [even] at the descent of the mount of Olives,
the whole multitude of the disciples began to rejoice and praise God with a loud
voice for all the mighty works which they had seen;
38 saying, Blessed [is] the King that cometh in the name of the Lord: peace in
heaven, and glory in the highest.
39 And some of the Pharisees from the multitude said unto him, Teacher, rebuke
thy disciples.
40 And he answered and said, I tell you that, if these shall hold their peace,
the stones will cry out.
41 And when he drew nigh, he saw the city and wept over it,
42 saying, If thou hadst known in this day, even thou, the things which belong
unto peace! but now they are hid from thine eyes.
43 For the days shall come upon thee, when thine enemies shall cast up a bank
about thee, and compass thee round, and keep thee in on every side,
44 and shall dash thee to the ground, and thy children within thee; and they
shall not leave in thee one stone upon another; because thou knewest not the
time of thy visitation.
45 And he entered into the temple, and began to cast out them that sold,
46 saying unto them, It is written, And my house shall be a house of prayer: but
ye have made it a den of robbers.
47 And he was teaching daily in the temple. But the chief priests and the
scribes and the principal men of the people sought to destroy him:
48 and they could not find what they might do; for the people all hung upon him,
listening.

Chapter 20

1 And it came to pass, on one of the days, as he was teaching the people in the
temple, and preaching the gospel, there came upon him the chief priests and the
scribes with the elders;
2 and they spake, saying unto him, Tell us: By what authority doest thou these
things? or who is he that gave thee this authority?
3 And he answered and said unto them, I also will ask you a question; and tell
me:
4 The baptism of John, was it from heaven, or from men?
5 And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; he
will say, Why did ye not believe him?
6 But if we shall say, From men; all the people will stone us: for they are
persuaded that John was a prophet.
7 And they answered, that they knew not whence [it was] .
8 And Jesus said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these
things.
9 And he began to speak unto the people this parable: A man planted a vineyard,
and let it out to husbandmen, and went into another country for a long time.
10 And at the season he sent unto the husbandmen a servant, that they should
give him of the fruit of the vineyard: but the husbandmen beat him, and sent him
away empty.
11 And he sent yet another servant: and him also they beat, and handled him
shamefully, and sent him away empty.
12 And he sent yet a third: and him also they wounded, and cast him forth.
13 And the lord of the vineyard said, What shall I do? I will send my beloved
son; it may be they will reverence him.
14 But when the husbandmen saw him, they reasoned one with another, saying, This
is the heir; let us kill him, that the inheritance may be ours.
15 And they cast him forth out of the vineyard, and killed him. What therefore
will the lord of the vineyard do unto them?
16 He will come and destroy these husbandmen, and will give the vineyard unto
others. And when they heard it, they said, God forbid.
17 But he looked upon them, and said, What then is this that is written, The
stone which the builders rejected, The same was made the head of the corner?
18 Every one that falleth on that stone shall be broken to pieces; but on
whomsoever it shall fall, it will scatter him as dust.
19 And the scribes and the chief priests sought to lay hands on him in that very
hour; and they feared the people: for they perceived that he spake this parable
against them.
20 And they watched him, and sent forth spies, who feigned themselves to be
righteous, that they might take hold of his speech, so as to deliver him up to
the rule and to the authority of the governor.
21 And they asked him, saying, Teacher, we know that thou sayest and teachest
rightly, and acceptest not the person [of any], but of a truth teachest the way
of God:
22 Is it lawful for us to give tribute unto Caesar, or not?
23 But he perceived their craftiness, and said unto them,
24 Show me a denarius. Whose image and superscription hath it? And they said,
Caesar's.
25 And he said unto them, Then render unto Caesar the things that are Caesar's,
and unto God the things that are God's.
26 And they were not able to take hold of the saying before the people: and they
marvelled at his answer, and held their peace.
27 And there came to him certain of the Sadducees, they that say that there is
no resurrection;
28 and they asked him, saying, Teacher, Moses wrote unto us, that if a man's
brother die, having a wife, and he be childless, his brother should take the
wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. [
29 There were therefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died
childless;
30 and the second:
31 and the third took her; and likewise the seven also left no children, and
died.
32 Afterward the woman also died.
33 In the resurrection therefore whose wife of them shall she be? for the seven
had her to wife.
34 And Jesus said unto them, The sons of this world marry, and are given in
marriage:
35 but they that are accounted worthy to attain to that world, and the
resurrection from the dead, neither marry, nor are given in marriage:
36 for neither can they die any more: for they are equal unto the angels; and
are sons of God, being sons of the resurrection.
37 But that the dead are raised, even Moses showed, in [the place concerning]
the Bush, when he calleth the Lord the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and
the God of Jacob.
38 Now he is not the God of the dead, but of the living: for all live unto him.
39 And certain of the scribes answering said, Teacher, thou hast well said.
40 For they durst not any more ask him any question.
41 And he said unto them, How say they that the Christ is David's son?
42 For David himself saith in the book of Psalms, The Lord said unto my Lord,
Sit thou on my right hand,
43 Till I make thine enemies the footstool of thy feet.
44 David therefore calleth him Lord, and how is he his son?
45 And in the hearing of all the people he said unto his disciples,
46 Beware of the scribes, who desire to walk in long robes, and love salutations
in the marketplaces, and chief seats in the synagogues, and chief places at
feasts;
47 who devour widows' houses, and for a pretence make long prayers: these shall
receive greater condemnation.

Chapter 21

1 And he looked up, and saw the rich men that were casting their gifts into the
treasury.
2 And he saw a certain poor widow casting in thither two mites.
3 And he said, Of a truth I say unto you, This poor widow cast in more than they
all:
4 for all these did of their superfluity cast in unto the gifts; but she of her
want did cast in all the living that she had.
5 And as some spake of the temple, how it was adorned with goodly stones and
offerings, he said,
6 As for these things which ye behold, the days will come, in which there shall
not be left here one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down.
7 And they asked him, saying, Teacher, when therefore shall these things be? and
what [shall be] the sign when these things are about to come to pass?
8 And he said, Take heed that ye be not led astray: for many shall come in my
name, saying, I am [he] ; and, The time is at hand: go ye not after them.
9 And when ye shall hear of wars and tumults, be not terrified: for these things
must needs come to pass first; but the end is not immediately.
10 Then said he unto them, Nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against
kingdom;
11 and there shall be great earthquakes, and in divers places famines and
pestilences; and there shall be terrors and great signs from heaven.
12 But before all these things, they shall lay their hands on you, and shall
persecute you, delivering you up to the synagogues and prisons, bringing you
before kings and governors for my name's sake.
13 It shall turn out unto you for a testimony.
14 Settle it therefore in your hearts, not to meditate beforehand how to answer:
15 for I will give you a mouth and wisdom, which all your adversaries shall not
be able to withstand or to gainsay.
16 But ye shall be delivered up even by parents, and brethren, and kinsfolk, and
friends; and [some] of you shall they cause to be put to death.
17 And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake.
18 And not a hair of your head shall perish.
19 In your patience ye shall win your souls.
20 But when ye see Jerusalem compassed with armies, then know that her
desolation is at hand.
21 Then let them that are in Judaea flee unto the mountains; and let them that
are in the midst of her depart out; and let not them that are in the country
enter therein.
22 For these are days of vengeance, that all things which are written may be
fulfilled.
23 Woe unto them that are with child and to them that give suck in those days!
for there shall be great distress upon the land, and wrath unto this people.
24 And they shall fall by the edge of the sword, and shall be led captive into
all the nations: and Jerusalem shall be trodden down of the Gentiles, until the
times of the Gentiles be fulfilled.
25 And there shall be signs in sun and moon and stars; and upon the earth
distress of nations, in perplexity for the roaring of the sea and the billows;
26 men fainting for fear, and for expectation of the things which are coming on
the world: for the powers of the heavens shall be shaken.
27 And then shall they see the Son of man coming in a cloud with power and great
glory.
28 But when these things begin to come to pass, look up, and lift up your heads;
because your redemption draweth nigh.
29 And he spake to them a parable: Behold the fig tree, and all the trees:
30 when they now shoot forth, ye see it and know of your own selves that the
summer is now nigh.
31 Even so ye also, when ye see these things coming to pass, know ye that the
kingdom of God is nigh.
32 Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, till all things
be accomplished.
33 Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away.
34 But take heed to yourselves, lest haply your hearts be overcharged with
surfeiting, and drunkenness, and cares of this life, and that day come on you
suddenly as a snare:
35 for [so] shall it come upon all them that dwell on the face of all the earth.
36 But watch ye at every season, making supplication, that ye may prevail to
escape all these things that shall come to pass, and to stand before the Son of
man.
37 And every day he was teaching in the temple; and every night he went out, and
lodged in the mount that is called Olivet.
38 And all the people came early in the morning to him in the temple, to hear
him.

Chapter 22

1 Now the feast of unleavened bread drew nigh, which is called the Passover.
2 And the chief priests and the scribes sought how they might put him to death;
for they feared the people.
3 And Satan entered into Judas who was called Iscariot, being of the number of
the twelve.
4 And he went away, and communed with the chief priests and captains, how he
might deliver him unto them.
5 And they were glad, and covenanted to give him money.
6 And he consented, and sought opportunity to deliver him unto them in the
absence of the multitude.
7 And the day of unleavened bread came, on which the passover must be
sacrificed.
8 And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and make ready for us the passover,
that we may eat.
9 And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we make ready?
10 And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city, there shall
meet you a man bearing a pitcher of water; follow him into the house whereinto
he goeth.
11 And ye shall say unto the master of the house, The Teacher saith unto thee,
Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples?
12 And he will show you a large upper room furnished: there make ready.
13 And they went, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the
passover.
14 And when the hour was come, he sat down, and the apostles with him.
15 And he said unto them, With desire I have desired to eat this passover with
you before I suffer:
16 for I say unto you, I shall not eat it, until it be fulfilled in the kingdom
of God.
17 And he received a cup, and when he had given thanks, he said, Take this, and
divide it among yourselves:
18 for I say unto you, I shall not drink from henceforth of the fruit of the
vine, until the kingdom of God shall come.
19 And he took bread, and when he had given thanks, he brake it, and gave to
them, saying, This is my body which is given for you: this do in remembrance of
me.
20 And the cup in like manner after supper, saying, This cup is the new covenant
in my blood, [even] that which is poured out for you.
21 But behold, the hand of him that betrayeth me is with me on the table.
22 For the Son of man indeed goeth, as it hath been determined: but woe unto
that man through whom he is betrayed!
23 And they began to question among themselves, which of them it was that should
do this thing.
24 And there arose also a contention among them, which of them was accounted to
be greatest.
25 And he said unto them, The kings of the Gentiles have lordship over them; and
they that have authority over them are called Benefactors.
26 But ye [shall] not [be] so: but he that is the greater among you, let him
become as the younger; and he that is chief, as he that doth serve.
27 For which is greater, he that sitteth at meat, or he that serveth? is not he
that sitteth at meat? but I am in the midst of you as he that serveth.
28 But ye are they that have continued with me in my temptations;
29 and I appoint unto you a kingdom, even as my Father appointed unto me,
30 that ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom; and ye shall sit on
thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel.
31 Simon, Simon, behold, Satan asked to have you, that he might sift you as
wheat:
32 but I made supplication for thee, that thy faith fail not; and do thou, when
once thou hast turned again, establish thy brethren.
33 And he said unto him, Lord, with thee I am ready to go both to prison and to
death.
34 And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, until thou
shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me.
35 And he said unto them, When I sent you forth without purse, and wallet, and
shoes, lacked ye anything? And they said, Nothing.
36 And he said unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him take it, and
likewise a wallet; and he that hath none, let him sell his cloak, and buy a
sword.
37 For I say unto you, that this which is written must be fulfilled in me, And
he was reckoned with transgressors: for that which concerneth me hath
fulfilment.
38 And they said, Lord, behold, here are two swords. And he said unto them, It
is enough.
39 And he came out, and went, as his custom was, unto the mount of Olives; and
the disciples also followed him.
40 And when he was at the place, he said unto them, Pray that ye enter not into
temptation.
41 And he was parted from them about a stone's cast; and he kneeled down and
prayed,
42 saying, Father, if thou be willing, remove this cup from me: nevertheless not
my will, but thine, be done.
43 And there appeared unto him an angel from heaven, strengthening him.
44 And being in an agony he prayed more earnestly; and his sweat became as it
were great drops of blood falling down upon the ground.
45 And when he rose up from his prayer, he came unto the disciples, and found
them sleeping for sorrow,
46 and said unto them, Why sleep ye? rise and pray, that ye enter not into
temptation.
47 While he yet spake, behold, a multitude, and he that was called Judas, one of
the twelve, went before them; and he drew near unto Jesus to kiss him.
48 But Jesus said unto him, Judas, betrayest thou the Son of man with a kiss?
49 And when they that were about him saw what would follow, they said, Lord,
shall we smite with the sword?
50 And a certain one of them smote the servant of the high priest, and struck
off his right ear.
51 But Jesus answered and said, Suffer ye [them] thus far. And he touched his
ear, and healed him.
52 And Jesus said unto the chief priests, and captains of the temple, and
elders, that were come against him, Are ye come out, as against a robber, with
swords and staves?
53 When I was daily with you in the temple, ye stretched not forth your hands
against me: but this is your hour, and the power of darkness.
54 And they seized him, and led him [away], and brought him into the high
priest's house. But Peter followed afar off.
55 And when they had kindled a fire in the midst of the court, and had sat down
together, Peter sat in the midst of them.
56 And a certain maid seeing him as he sat in the light [of the fire], and
looking stedfastly upon him, said, This man also was with him.
57 But he denied, saying, Woman, I know him not.
58 And after a little while another saw him, and said, Thou also art [one] of
them. But Peter said, Man, I am not.
59 And after the space of about one hour another confidently affirmed, saying,
Of a truth this man also was with him; for he is a Galilaean.
60 But Peter said, Man, I know not what thou sayest. And immediately, while he
yet spake, the cock crew.
61 And the Lord turned, and looked upon Peter. And Peter remembered the word of
the Lord, how that he said unto him, Before the cock crow this day thou shalt
deny me thrice.
62 And he went out, and wept bitterly.
63 And the men that held [Jesus] mocked him, and beat him.
64 And they blindfolded him, and asked him, saying, Prophesy: who is he that
struck thee?
65 And many other things spake they against him, reviling him.
66 And as soon as it was day, the assembly of the elders of the people was
gathered together, both chief priests and scribes; and they led him away into
their council, saying,
67 If thou art the Christ, tell us. But he said unto them, If I tell you, ye
will not believe:
68 and if I ask [you], ye will not answer.
69 But from henceforth shall the Son of man be seated at the right hand of the
power of God.
70 And they all said, Art thou then the Son of God? And he said unto them, Ye
say that I am.
71 And they said, What further need have we of witness? for we ourselves have
heard from his own mouth.

Chapter 23

1 And the whole company of them rose up, and brought him before Pilate.
2 And they began to accuse him, saying, We found this man perverting our nation,
and forbidding to give tribute to Caesar, and saying that he himself is Christ a
king.
3 And Pilate asked him, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answered
him and said, Thou sayest.
4 And Pilate said unto the chief priests and the multitudes, I find no fault in
this man.
5 But they were the more urgent, saying, He stirreth up the people, teaching
throughout all Judaea, and beginning from Galilee even unto this place.
6 But when Pilate heard it, he asked whether the man were a Galilaean.
7 And when he knew that he was of Herod's jurisdiction, he sent him unto Herod,
who himself also was at Jerusalem in these days.
8 Now when Herod saw Jesus, he was exceeding glad: for he was of a long time
desirous to see him, because he had heard concerning him; and he hoped to see
some miracle done by him.
9 And he questioned him in many words; but he answered him nothing.
10 And the chief priests and the scribes stood, vehemently accusing him.
11 And Herod with his soldiers set him at nought, and mocked him, and arraying
him in gorgeous apparel sent him back to Pilate.
12 And Herod and Pilate became friends with each other that very day: for before
they were at enmity between themselves.
13 And Pilate called together the chief priests and the rulers and the people,
14 and said unto them, Ye brought unto me this man, as one that perverteth the
people: and behold, I having examined him before you, found no fault in this man
touching those things whereof ye accuse him:
15 no, nor yet Herod: for he sent him back unto us; and behold, nothing worthy
of death hath been done by him.
16 I will therefore chastise him, and release him.
17 (Ommitted)
18 But they cried out all together, saying, Away with this man, and release unto
us Barabbas:--
19 one who for a certain insurrection made in the city, and for murder, was cast
into prison.
20 And Pilate spake unto them again, desiring to release Jesus;
21 but they shouted, saying, Crucify, crucify him.
22 And he said unto them the third time, Why, what evil hath this man done? I
have found no cause of death in him: I will therefore chastise him and release
him.
23 But they were urgent with loud voices, asking that he might be crucified. And
their voices prevailed.
24 And Pilate gave sentence that what they asked for should be done.
25 And he released him that for insurrection and murder had been cast into
prison, whom they asked for; but Jesus he delivered up to their will.
26 And when they led him away, they laid hold upon one Simon of Cyrene, coming
from the country, and laid on him the cross, to bear it after Jesus.
27 And there followed him a great multitude of the people, and of women who
bewailed and lamented him.
28 But Jesus turning unto them said, Daughters of Jerusalem, weep not for me,
but weep for yourselves, and for your children.
29 For behold, the days are coming, in which they shall say, Blessed are the
barren, and the wombs that never bare, and the breasts that never gave suck.
30 Then shall they begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and to the hills,
Cover us.
31 For if they do these things in the green tree, what shall be done in the dry?
32 And there were also two others, malefactors, led with him to be put to death.
33 And when they came unto the place which is called The skull, there they
crucified him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand and the other on the
left.
34 And Jesus said, Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do. And
parting his garments among them, they cast lots.
35 And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also scoffed at him, saying,
He saved others; let him save himself, if this is the Christ of God, his chosen.
36 And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, offering him vinegar,
37 and saying, If thou art the King of the Jews, save thyself.
38 And there was also a superscription over him, THIS IS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
39 And one of the malefactors that were hanged railed on him, saying, Art not
thou the Christ? save thyself and us.
40 But the other answered, and rebuking him said, Dost thou not even fear God,
seeing thou art in the same condemnation?
41 And we indeed justly; for we receive the due reward of our deeds: but this
man hath done nothing amiss.
42 And he said, Jesus, remember me when thou comest in thy kingdom.
43 And he said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, To-day shalt thou be with me in
Paradise.
44 And it was now about the sixth hour, and a darkness came over the whole land
until the ninth hour,
45 the sun's light failing: and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst.
46 And Jesus, crying with a loud voice, said, Father, into thy hands I commend
my spirit: and having said this, he gave up the ghost.
47 And when the centurion saw what was done, he glorified God, saying, Certainly
this was a righteous man.
48 And all the multitudes that came together to this sight, when they beheld the
things that were done, returned smiting their breasts.
49 And all his acquaintance, and the women that followed with him from Galilee,
stood afar off, seeing these things.
50 And behold, a man named Joseph, who was a councillor, a good and righteous
man
51 (he had not consented to their counsel and deed), [a man] of Arimathaea, a
city of the Jews, who was looking for the kingdom of God:
52 this man went to Pilate, and asked for the body of Jesus.
53 And he took it down, and wrapped it in a linen cloth, and laid him in a tomb
that was hewn in stone, where never man had yet lain.
54 And it was the day of the Preparation, and the sabbath drew on.
55 And the women, who had come with him out of Galilee, followed after, and
beheld the tomb, and how his body was laid.
56 And they returned, and prepared spices and ointments. And on the sabbath they
rested according to the commandment.

Chapter 24

1 But on the first day of the week, at early dawn, they came unto the tomb,
bringing the spices which they had prepared.
2 And they found the stone rolled away from the tomb.
3 And they entered in, and found not the body of the Lord Jesus.
4 And it came to pass, while they were perplexed thereabout, behold, two men
stood by them in dazzling apparel:
5 and as they were affrighted and bowed down their faces to the earth, they said
unto them, Why seek ye the living among the dead?
6 He is not here, but is risen: remember how he spake unto you when he was yet
in Galilee,
7 saying that the Son of man must be delivered up into the hands of sinful men,
and be crucified, and the third day rise again.
8 And they remembered his words,
9 and returned from the tomb, and told all these things to the eleven, and to
all the rest.
10 Now they were Mary Magdalene, and Joanna, and Mary the [mother] of James: and
the other women with them told these things unto the apostles.
11 And these words appeared in their sight as idle talk; and they disbelieved
them.
12 But Peter arose, and ran unto the tomb; and stooping and looking in, he seeth
the linen cloths by themselves; and he departed to his home, wondering at that
which was come to pass.
13 And behold, two of them were going that very day to a village named Emmaus,
which was threescore furlongs from Jerusalem.
14 And they communed with each other of all these things which had happened.
15 And it came to pass, while they communed and questioned together, that Jesus
himself drew near, and went with them.
16 But their eyes were holden that they should not know him.
17 And he said unto them, What communications are these that ye have one with
another, as ye walk? And they stood still, looking sad.
18 And one of them, named Cleopas, answering said unto him, Dost thou alone
sojourn in Jerusalem and not know the things which are come to pass there in
these days?
19 And he said unto them, What things? And they said unto him, The things
concerning Jesus the Nazarene, who was a prophet mighty in deed and word before
God and all the people:
20 and how the chief priests and our rulers delivered him up to be condemned to
death, and crucified him.
21 But we hoped that it was he who should redeem Israel. Yea and besides all
this, it is now the third day since these things came to pass.
22 Moreover certain women of our company amazed us, having been early at the
tomb;
23 and when they found not his body, they came, saying, that they had also seen
a vision of angels, who said that he was alive.
24 And certain of them that were with us went to the tomb, and found it even so
as the women had said: but him they saw not.
25 And he said unto them, O foolish men, and slow of heart to believe in all
that the prophets have spoken!
26 Behooved it not the Christ to suffer these things, and to enter into his
glory?
27 And beginning from Moses and from all the prophets, he interpreted to them in
all the scriptures the things concerning himself.
28 And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they were going: and he made as
though he would go further.
29 And they constrained him, saying, Abide with us; for it is toward evening,
and the day is now far spent. And he went in to abide with them.
30 And it came to pass, when he had sat down with them to meat, he took the
bread and blessed; and breaking [it] he gave to them.
31 And their eyes were opened, and they knew him; and he vanished out of their
sight.
32 And they said one to another, Was not our heart burning within us, while he
spake to us in the way, while he opened to us the scriptures?
33 And they rose up that very hour, and returned to Jerusalem, and found the
eleven gathered together, and them that were with them,
34 saying, The Lord is risen indeed, and hath appeared to Simon.
35 And they rehearsed the things [that happened] in the way, and how he was
known of them in the breaking of the bread.
36 And as they spake these things, he himself stood in the midst of them, and
saith unto them, Peace [be] unto you.
37 But they were terrified and affrighted, and supposed that they beheld a
spirit.
38 And he said unto them, Why are ye troubled? and wherefore do questionings
arise in your heart?
39 See my hands and my feet, that it is I myself: handle me, and see; for a
spirit hath not flesh and bones, as ye behold me having.
40 And when he had said this, he showed them his hands and his feet.
41 And while they still disbelieved for joy, and wondered, he said unto them,
Have ye here anything to eat?
42 And they gave him a piece of a broiled fish .
43 And he took it, and ate before them.
44 And he said unto them, These are my words which I spake unto you, while I was
yet with you, that all things must needs be fulfilled, which are written in the
law of Moses, and the prophets, and the psalms, concerning me.
45 Then opened he their mind, that they might understand the scriptures;
46 and he said unto them, Thus it is written, that the Christ should suffer, and
rise again from the dead the third day;
47 and that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name unto
all the nations, beginning from Jerusalem.
48 Ye are witnesses of these things.
49 And behold, I send forth the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry ye in
the city, until ye be clothed with power from on high.
50 And he led them out until [they were] over against Bethany: and he lifted up
his hands, and blessed them.
51 And it came to pass, while he blessed them, he parted from them, and was
carried up into heaven.
52 And they worshipped him, and returned to Jerusalem with great joy:
53 and were continually in the temple, blessing God.
